[Daily Discussion] Sunday, April 22, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Monday, April 23, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e8qok/daily_discussion_monday_april_23_2018/)
Don't worry guys, the drop was probably due to L14dy selling off all his coins. 
With alts (ETH in particular) on a strong second wind eclipsing previous local resistances, I expect BTC to break above 9k in very short order, likely today.
ETH is leading again..BTC follows?
truth be told, we have been climbing steadily since April 1  think?
Long $2mm @ $8908. Stops at 5%. Surprisingly low sell pressure, this should be a worthwhile swing trade.

Edit: May add to this position. 
Added 10% to my x5 long (avg entry below 8.8) ~45% invested with my trade stack now

Also added ~8% of my investment capital back in BTC. About 50% invested.

Feeling verry comfortable again within these positions. 
will carefully evaluate today's price action and set comfortable stops before i got to bed to make sure i lock in profits in the case we resume our downtrend the next morning
you know the trend is changing when moonboys appear again to shitpost on this sub
Closed my short at around $8,960 for a smallish loss. 

Not fucking around with buyers right now. They're nuts. 
Now this is podracing
In a little over three hours our new Altcoin Discussion will go live. It will recur every three days. I realize this is controversial, and don't expect you all to support this, but after hearing from enough of our users who wanted one we decided to give it a shot. This is not necessarily a permanent thing, and we will be monitoring it closely. If it doesn't go well we'll just cancel it. Be sure to read the thread rules when the post goes up, before commenting in the thread. The thread will be in our second sticky spot, below the Daily.

We are not trying to replace subs like /r/CryptoCurrency, nor could we. This will be one single thread, reposted every three days (not even a full daily), and we will expect a high level of discourse. Everything else about our sub will remain the same except that we will be even more sticklers for the bitcoin-only Daily Discussion thread remaining bitcoin only. 
Looks like ETH leading the market today, for some reason it always(since 3 years) have strong moves in April. Maybe the tax return meme is real
Really confused now and hoping someone can share what exactly is going on now. I have a confirmed bitmex withdrawal of my entire balance there, and I'm somehow still able to open a position LOL. I opened a 1x leverage hedge short at 8930 even though at this point my withdrawal is already confirmed. So I'm confused as to what will happen should account balance drop below withdrawal confirmed amount 

Edit: apparently bitmex somehow cancelled it still even though earlier on when I tried to cancel it told me twice that there was an error cancelling and could not be done as I already gave email approval. Weird. 
No idea what to do right now. My head says short, my gut says long. 


This subreddit has made me doubt myself more times in the last 1 month than I have in the last 10 years combined.
There is def a correlation between people in this thread saying BTC will go down and price rising 
Bitcoin is daring both bulls and bears to make a move... Chickens! 
Damn it, opened at a short at 8840 last night but now I'm considering closing it and opening a long. Not sure what to make of anything right now - does it want to try to break 9 or is this just the final pump?
We are literally moving $50 in either direction with volumes <20 BTC lol...
Relonged futures at 8879. I know the Bitmex market is quite low liquidity and high spread but that futures now are trading 20-30$ behind swaps price could be seen as a bullish sign, before it was more 80-100$
FYI... Top contract holder on OK has a larger position than the next FOUR holders combined.
r/bitcoinmarkets is closing their longs and switching to short...we all know what btc is going to do next, don't we?
I knew that leftover Diazepam would come in handy one day. My nerves are shot.
These buyers are absolutely fucking relentless. 

Opened a short today at 9056, but closed it at the last drop about 30-45 minutes ago because it was rejected off 9k with a higher low. 

The rejection keeps weakening and the buying power keeps strengthening. 

RSI put its breaks on and it’s cooling off and I believe we will break 9k and hold. 

I’ll most likely set a small short for 9200 with super tight stops Incase we get heavily rejected which could play out profitable. If we get rejected from there I’ll most likely open up a long since the buyers are showing no signs of stopping for the next push to 9.2k 
[deleted]
Kraken whale at it again! Crazy arbitrage compared to Bitfinex. It goes north of $50 difference from time to time.

I know people always says this, but the next few hours feels like a quite pivotal moment, with big ascending wedges, 9.1k double tops etc. at play here...

Edit: I've been scaling into a small long since 8650 (https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8dtgp5/daily_discussion_saturday_april_21_2018/dxqjfvd/)
Longing futures from 8926, let's see where this goes. I would not be surprised if another test of 9200 happened today
Shorting at 9000 is basically free money, until the time that it isn't.
Finally we get the Feb.1st pump. Once Chinese New year ends we should be cruising past 11.8. 
2 part bear div on 4 hour rsi confirms in 15 minutes. 
 https://www.tradingview.com/x/W1EfyLsA/

Should bring us to at least friday US market close ($8500, pink dotted line), which also is where we broke out from long term downward trendline. https://www.tradingview.com/x/8ykJB9BL/

I'm long. 

I think the longer we hang about 9000 the faster we'll blast through it. I think people can see the writing on the wall that this bear market is over or at least stalling. 
GDAX is touching the 12hr 200 EMA but broke above the log-resistance and the 8600 fib retracement. Some sideways would not be surprising, but breaking out of the log downtrend is super bullish so I expect to see 11k. Testing the resistance makes more sense than testing support at this time.
This is beginning to look weak.  I exited my long for a modest profit... don't know if we're going to see $9.2k before we cool off.  We're also due to retest the log line.  I'll be buying there if we happen to dump.

I'm leaning cautiously bullish as we've broken the log line.. we did so at extended RSI however which hasn't allowed for this breakout to be a real run-away.  I suspect there will be lots of buyers once we recurse a bit, and it will be a good place to build a long.
I’m back to all cash with my trading stack. I’m going to take a short break from trading. I’ll be watching the price, but I plan to take the longer term route and avoid making trades more than 1-3 times per month or only when the trade is perfect. 

I expect us to pull back on the weekly chart to the 7800 range as part of the current equilibrium pattern we are in at that time frame. When we get in that area, I’ll probably buy back in. I expect a break up in the late June/early July timeframe. 

I’ll still likely post what I’m seeing on the charts regularly here, but I don’t plan to be actively trading nearly as much. I lost a chunk of change because I got too caught up during the last BGD and I just need to step back for a bit. 

Cheers gents. 
This reminds me of the time we were moving back and forth through 10k as if there wasn't any resistance.
Well we were rejected yet again from 9000, but the rejection wasn't nearly as violent this time. 
Alts have given up following bitcoin swings for now.
Do holder demographics influence your portfolio?

i.e. anecdotally adjusting your holdings when: more intelligent individuals w/ domain-specific knowledge* you're associated with hold high % of x, whereas those less perceived intelligent tend to hold a high % of y
Do all stop orders on gdax now have fees?
*Partially hedging long with short.  Canceled the bid ladder for the long, I think if we go down it'll be far enough and long enough to make a new position.  If we haven't broken out before I go to bed, will probably set a stop below our wedge's support on the long and above for the short, and wake up to a double stop out from a fakeout.  Though short is smaller so mathematically I could get away with not stopping that one out, then again that makes the fakeout situation potentially more lossy than a double SL, if we fake low then go high.

If using ETH as an indicator, its run today looks like it's just running out of steam, so unless they sell it all into BTC, it makes me feel like that's all the buying pressure we've got today.
Still in position, put stops slighlty below our current support so i still take some minor profits incase we go down hard. ~8700.

We didn't even drop below 8.8 today, and we're still way above 8.5. 2nd day above log support. If tommorow stays like this i'm probably adding more.
I just remember this post from this one guy, when we where in the 6ks, that he believes we will go back up to 9.2k to break the log line slightly, to increase confusion and to get the fomo boys back in to bring us than afterwards to goblin town. if this was our highest point, this guy is a magican. He wrote a long post about it. anybody remembers the name?
The Vegeta Resistance seems quite strong

As a sidenote \- the new reddit UI is the worst thing I've seen in my life.
Strong bullish case on the 4h. Personally I think entering a long now is risky business just underneath monthly pivot resistance and with the momentum lines stretched so far apart, but, judging by the number of readers here now (x3 average and rising), if we do break out soon it'll be a nice FOMO rally. 

4h: https://www.tradingview.com/x/ywb93xsA/

Edit: so many lurkers and so few contributors.
This squeezing buying dips is getting higher and higher, and bought up faster and faster. This is basically a text book pattern  I feel, is it ascending triangle where the ceiling(9k) is the same but the higher lows slowly will converge to the top of it ?
[removed]
For those that follow the chart guys on YouTube, today was very interesting. It was discussed that the weekly correlation between the S&P 500 & BTC was much more correlated than previously thought. Not saying one guys opinion is an absolute, but since this issue is critical, it's worth your 15 min of time. He is very level headed, regardless if you agree or disagree. 

Also, tldr, there is a compelling argument that we are in for 5-7 weeks of consolidation, might be a good time for noob DCA instructions.

Personally, I'm stoked for the rest of 2018, think some chop in the interim. Hang in there and consume as much info as possible. Crypto voices podcast this week had a huge segment on side chains and post bitcoin maximumlism. Good stuff. 
Just my newbish observations so make of it what you will. 
It appears we have been making a fairly slow and steady rise since Wednesday, with just a couple of spikes up and down the main one with volume to push us up through the log resistance line. Followed  by a pullbackof arround 5-6% after hitting resistance again arround 9.1k. 
We dropped towards the log resistance and when we approached it found support and started our steady rise again.
Is this not pretty much what most people's  ideal bullish scenario was. 
Not going to high to fast, making a reasonable pullback without falling back under the log line. Then continuing at a nice pace back to test 9.1-2k 
I am struggling to see why the market has some people so confused the last week or so. 

Edit a word
50% now in USDT, flashbacks to previous dowturns haunt me.
4 hour bear div played out successfully we now have 6 hour bear div on the rsi confirmed.  1 day and 12 hour bear div confirmed on macd hist as well.  https://www.tradingview.com/x/biZPXGIi/
Somethings gotta give here 

Https://Imgur.com/a/pOlGLQU
Come on break this with good conviction!


[deleted]
Here's my dilemma. I'd bought in my stack of alts at very low prices back in beginning of March. I took profits recently. Now I can't seem to find an entry price. What would you all suggest? Even though BTC seems to have momentum at the moment, I still believe most alts are overbought at current levels.
Looks like a tight wedge forming to me. https://cryptocharts.org/i/1524433777.png But I'm pretty new to this. What do you all think?
Short 9056 with stops above 9200. 

I’ve been getting destroyed shorting lately but this seems like the play 

Edit: Cool i did something right for once 
Seems like with Bitcoin the old "Time in market > timing market" thing rings especially true.
Over at r/cryptocurrency everyone is bullish AF , talking about moon and lambos
Seems like pullback is imminent 
Seeing how Bitcoin enjoys maximum pain, it would not surprise me to see it touch 9.3k only to tumble down to 7k again. In any other market, I'd be extremely bullish seeing this price action. The buying pressure is really strong at the moment.
Shower Thought. The only way this market has been able to build an uptrend movement is whale-size market buy orders and subsequent short squeezing. Other than spikes, as other more experienced lads have pointed out, volume and volatility is quite low. I don't see how this can be perceived as a strong bullish signal right now. Unless who market buys is some naive whale with very deep pockets or some naive bitcoin enthusiast who wants the "magic internet money" to succeed, then this is very orchestrated in my opinion. And it's also working quite well so far.  Maybe if this continues up to 10k and over, the rest of the market will genuinely follow due to media coverage and renewed “unaware” bullish sentiment but i think the more we grow the more a retrace will hit hard.
[deleted]
Not sure if this wedge is valid? https://www.tradingview.com/x/WNEzXpGm/

Either way, I'm gonna short. imo we're too hot, need to cool off and consolidate for a little bit. yesterday was relatively quiet and today there's even less price action. something is brewing.

Watching 15 min for entry but stops at 9050 and targets between 8600 to 8000. looking for long entries below 8k

EDIT: 1/3 entry filled at 9000

EDIT2: another 1/3 filled at 8900

EDIT3: going with just two positions so above is acutally 1/2 @ 9000 and 1/2 @8900
So we just smacked our head against 9k again, didn't even make it a little past this time. And yet the buyers seem to be there between 8.7 and 9. Really don't know what to make of any of this. 
Its so weird, 1k coins get dumped \(volume\) and price drops 100 USD, then only 100 coins are needed to push the price back up.
Looks like a hidden bullish divergence on the 2H? https://www.tradingview.com/x/216vVDgc/

Not very knowledgeable about them so would appreciate any input, I know /u/joyrider5 posted a bearish divergence on the higher time frames.
Closed long for profit at 8900 from around CA 8500 when I saw that 9000 had failed again. But looking at the rebound from 8800, how alts are performing and that we seem to be making new higher lows. There might be room for more and hopefully it's not a double top.

I think it's a terrible place to open another long but I did anyway after that rebound from 8800. I'll keep an eye on this trendline and see if it holds, tight stops below it.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/0EIWFNXr/
I can look at TA and estimate and then project the extent of how BTC is being led or not by alts.  But in the back of my mind, it's certainly plausible that this new bull run in crypto is keyed by the possibility that crypto has undergone a defining structural change that alts are essentially decoupled from BTC which is making rotation and pumps to BTC not as profitable if not a poor proposition altogether.  It's not something that gives an actionable trade in the moment but it's definitely something to keep in mind since the market is constantly evolving.  I will admit, I am impressed at how strong BCH has been.  I have not taken any additional position in alts to since January.  My trades and analysis are implicitly influenced by the underlying assumption of BTC being the dominant and pre-imminent coin.
Woke up to a few messages from friends and family about BTC and LTC, all of them were people who thought they'd missed out. Could be the next round of FOMO coming on with the next oush up.
So let's say I want btc to trade but don't want to be affected by the price going up and down and would want to sell around the same price as I bought it. How would I achieve this? This should be possible with a forward contract or something right? 

How do I go about doing this? What would I have to post as collateral? And what if I want to trade on a different exchange and take this btc away. Possible? 
Finally. Got it over with. Sometimes I wonder what takes so long.

Aaaannnd back to waiting. Swing trading between 8975 and 9000 must be painful.
So many fakeouts in this market :(

At least we are in a short-term, multi-day uptrend though.
Price at 8888.8... chinese whales say pamp it
I have decided to exit my long at $8,910 from $8,000, walking away with 11.15% gains.

To me it looks like $9,000 has quite strong resistance and it is not looking that easy to get past through it. We already tried three times in the last two days. First time we hit this price, we dropped straight away, the second and third time (today) we hit it, we dropped more rapidly comparatively. 

I am not going to short here either, just going to stay out of position until I am more clear towards the general consensus of the market and it's direction. 


Should have held my short from 9056. 

I do this WAY too often. 
June 29 futures on bitmex have moved up level with spot just now. Seems like a bullish sign to me. They were 100 usd below spot last week.

[removed]
i read a series of posts earlier all closing longs some switching to short... i guess this sub as a whole is underwater 
It's exactly 101 days since price was last above the daily kumo. I'm still holding out to see if there's a little more upside and the wick above yesterday is an encouraging but by no means decisive move. Interestingly, the mid-line of that price-date range coincides with the range around 11k where we spent two weeks in January and where price topped out twice in February. 

1d: https://www.tradingview.com/x/e67gYNc1

The 3d kumo resistance is also around 11k, so given that we're now toying with 9k, I'm pushing R2 to 10k (although I think 9.5k could still be a pivot, let's call it R1.5. 

We're above the daily kijun too for the first time in a while, and having had a brief test of support already in the high 7ks. The tenkan support (R1) would be 8.5k and the local bottom of 6.5k would/will be the extreme downside target (R3) in the event of a turnaround.

Edit: numbers

Closed my long positions. This could go either way, but I'd sooner take profits at my original target than risk being distracted by what will be a busy but interesting week here. I'll be reassessing as time permits whether there's a correction, continuation or a reversal. 
This was the first 30m close below kijun on double 30m / single 1h ichimoku cloud since the rise from 8k. I believe we'll see a small correction here. Therefore, I closed my long position at 8850 and are entirely in fiat at the moment.

I believe we will see edge-to-edge action here and find support at the bottom of the double 30m / single 1h cloud at about 8650. This won't make a lower local low, and bounce off for another test at 9k.

I'm planning to re-enter upon double 12h / single 1d kijun break above 9.1k.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/ZVJa1Qcf/

Edit1: Fixed price typo. Thanks /u/justanotherlogin

Edit2: I think I read that wrong. There isn't enough bear signals on the double 30m cloud to justify edge-to-edge here. I think the bounce off double 1h kijun will hold for now (8760).
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I know btc is king, but its so much fun to have some alts in your portfolio. Ocn, for example, is doing gods work this week for me. Up 134% in a week. 
Daily stoch RSI recrossed over in the overbought zone. The last one ended up being a fakeout due to the pumps to push us over that log resistance line but this is forming a double dop with the last time we touched 9/9.1k. I am underwater in a short with CA 8.5 that I thought I closed before I went out of town this weekend so I'm trying to make sure this isn't bear hopium, but I think this is going to be a bearish week so I am keeping it open. (On the plus side at least I thought I had closed it out this weekend so I was able to enjoy myself in ignorance while the price kept rising.)
It seems reckless to short here with top 5 alts pumping like nobody's business. I'm going to be layering a short at 9.2-9.3. Unfortunately my long entries never got filled around 8.6 so I don't have any other good r/r plays to ride out or make besides shorting 9.2.

Goodluck to the underwater shorts right now, It's going to get incredibly expensive to keep those alive if we keep rising. 
**Here is a summary of recent market fundamentals**. I post this because not everyone understands the reality of the market today:

1. 1.5 billion people no longer have access to buy bitcoin in an easy way due to the india / pakistan ban of bank movements to buy crypto (they can only buy / sell in cash person to person now). This is a measurable, non-disputable contraction of the market.

2. China (1.2 billion people) in the last several months has started to really enforce their ban even going after OTC markets which were previously still legal. This again, compared to a year ago, is a measurable decline in actual market potential size.

3. Look at the http://google.com/trends data for Bitcoin. This is approaching yearly lows. That search term encompasses anyone looking for "bitcoin price" or "bitcoin news" which would include many hodlers searching every single day. It is declining, even during this rally. That is especially scary given that "Bitcoin" today represents 5 different coins (bitcion, bitcoin cash, etc) whereas a year ago it was only 1 coin.

4. The traffic on exchanges are in severe declines. You can see this here: https://www.alexa.com/siteinfo/coinbase.com There is also evidence of this from exchanges such as Bitfinex reducing capitalization requirements to attract more traders.

5. Regulators, though slow, are increasingly adding restrictions and investigating crypto projects, worldwide. You can delude yourself into saying "regulation is good for bitcoin", but the end of the day any friction in the buying / selling process is bad for bitcoin. Even small things like the (likey) regulatory pressure that made localbitcoins start to do KYC creates friction.

6. **Perhaps the MOST important thing to the crypto price was ICOs**. WHY? I will tell you. ICOs created the INCENTIVE to advertise crypto. Me wanting to make 100 million on my ICO made me spend 10 million on advertisements on facebook, twitter, reddit, youtube, etc. These ads brought people into crypto. Made them research what crypto is, how to buy it, etc. This is the REASON for the market expansino in the first place. What's the PROBLEM? Well, Facebook, Twitter, Google are banning crypto ads. So, the "marketing arm" of crypto is being cut off. Soon, the way to attract newbies into the space to sell coins to will diminish. Without seeing ads literally everywhere about crypto it will become "out of sight out of mind" or in other words BORING. In addition to the ban on ads, worldwide governments are cracking down on ICOs period. 

7. You can see on-chain blockchain transactions for bitcoin are at 2 year LOWS. That is a direct measure of actual use. That is irrefutable proof of a contraction market.

8. FOMO was previously reflected in the stock market via high premiums being paid for public companies that were related to blockchain. This bullishness has all but disappeared and prices of many blockchain stock companies has collapsed 90% and there is no longer premium.
Legitimate FOMO is starting to build again....I love it.
Guys, I just don't know. I feel we got here way too quickly. Alts are bubbling again full of bs. All those huge candles were such BS. I was so hopeful that the bottom was in, and I was so sure it was. Now I honestly don't care anymore. This entire market is so manipulated that I want no part in it anymore.

I'm moving coins to exchanges. Going to start selling. Thinking of taking a big long break from Crypto to enjoy my cash.

Good luck gents. Goodbye
entered at 8144... don't know if i should hold or just sell tonight 
How does the volume movements affect the big ascending wedge we're in? For a formation to carry more weight, the volume has to decline throughout the formation.

And while the volume have been decreasing, it has not decreased a whole lot (if we ignore the two first volume candles). And in fact, since the middle of the wedge, one can argue that the volume have been _increasing_.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/k9oIYu45/

Any thoughts on this?
I don't know how people are so surprised by the resistance at 9k Zoom a bit, look how many times we bounced from 9k , one way or the other.  5. And more are even debatable.
What truly interests me is the pricing during halving. Thats going to be epic. 
This is like third time 9k was rejected in last two days. I'm thinking about closing my long if we drop to 8.5.
Seeing a pretty clear ascending triangle on the hourly (top horizontal line a little above $9k). We’re flirting with the bottom of the trend line rn, so wouldn’t be surprised to see a breakdown, but looking more for a break up and a test of $9.2k. 

$9.2k and $9.8k have become pretty formidable support/resistance levels and will be difficult levels to break imo. Breaking $9.8k would lead me to believe that this “reversal” may have some serious legs. However, I’m still of the belief that this is simply another blip up and the overall trend remains down (i.e. we’ll see sub $6k in the coming months). 
High court of Dehli issued a notice to Reserve Bank of India, the Ministry of Finance and Goods and Services Tax Council citing the crypto ban violating constitution. Do you think this could result in a reversing the government crackdown trend we're having since last year? Maybe china following suit and Korea allowing ICOs?
Alts starting to warm up again, let's see if the pattern repeats
If we are still in the wedge 2 days from now and at 9-9.2(3) K then I might short this FOMO honey badger, until then holding just fiat as I dont feel comfortable atm to open a long nor a short. So lets wait and see what the market has in store for us.

[WEDGE](https://www.tradingview.com/x/8cTkuYHi)

[more indicators](https://www.tradingview.com/x/SBotcTW2)
I wanted to sell my holdings at 8940 with no leverage (bought at 8750). Just realized I actually opened a x5 short position. Don't trade while tired guys, even though I'm kinda lucky this time. Sold the rest of my holdings at 8848 and keeping my short for now. 
We haven't hit bottom. Not sure why everyone is so damn bullish. The volume on this rise is unconvincing, it's just another pump. We haven't seen capitulation - we need to see daily volume as high as our 6k bottom. It'll take a while to wipe away the delusions and I'm expecting $4k by the end of fall.

Edit Apr 25 2018, $3k is our possible low. It's rock solid support and is a 85% drop, just like 2014.
Expecting some action with in the next hour or two once this breaks..

https://www.tradingview.com/x/MEqR7Pyh/
A whale is deaccumulating here the last days. Waits till price recovers and sells big amounts..     
Starting to look toppy like it's rolling over.   I am switching over to a short, but far from a slam dunk.  It's still close to $9K and a whale type order could spike it above, very easily and quickly.
Alts are running again, something that usually happens when btc sits in a narrow range but can also lead to a pump.

It's going to be interesting how 9k is dealt with. This could also hold btc back until they finish.
What happened to the good old weekend dip?
That rising wedge still looks to be holding up. Jeez...
Hey fellas, beginning a live analysis of Bitcoin price action and perhaps some live trading sprinkled in. Open discussion format for anyone interested.

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s5y7DFcvjMw](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s5y7DFcvjMw)
[removed]
Why do people keep saying buy pressure is strong? Looking at the candles it takes large volume to move the price up. And, small sell pressure crashes the price.

Several hours ago it too 1k in buys to go from 8964 to 9026. Just a few candles later it took 1k sells to go from  8926 to 8787.

I am seeing this in the charts a lot where the effort to increase price is becoming more and more and the effort to decrease it is declining. This is a sign of panic buying, but not actual real strong buy pressure. Any shift in seller-sentiment such as a negative news article on Monday will see this go down a lot.
[removed]
We are knocking on the door of our medium term resistance of 9100. If 9100 breaks expect the fomo to start. Unlike many here I am actually short term bullish long term bearish. I expect us to retest 11.7k in the next few weeks with a strong rejection and the signal of a multi month bear market.
I opened a long at 8750 and closed at 8825 when chewy went short because I hate countertrading him. Now I feel like rageshorting 9k. I need to step back and away from bitmex for a bit. 
Looks risky taking a position in this range. Place your bets!


https://www.tradingview.com/x/oD15rT8t/

I see double top at 9K in the 12h. 
Closed my long just under break even as we crossed the wedge with force.

*And added to short, ca 8900.

[Once again, eth lead the way](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/dxssic5/). (I opened a short on that at that time too)
Opened a short here, think this is a real change of direction.

I think we will test at least the edge of the wedge. currently at 8.7k
Looking very bullish tonight. All tip 5 alts pumping and volumes holding steady.10k+ by end of week
How do you think [Goodhart's Law](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Goodhart%27s_law) applies to TA and crypto trading, in general?

"When a measure becomes a target, it ceases to be a good measure."
Butting heads with the daily kumo, and it's getting stuffed. Normally, price would be able to blow past this level if there wasn't significant resistance (i.e. thinner cloud == weaker resistance and price is stalling here). What this is suggesting is that even if we saw a kumo breakout, bullishness of price forecast/target would not make anyone blush. Just be careful not to chad your way to a bad position.

*Disclaimer: This is FUD and is meant to make you sell me your coins. jk, but maybe not really.*

https://www.tradingview.com/x/bNYSgMIQ
I've been thinking about taking out a loan using bitcoin as collateral to buy more bitcoin. Has anyone actually done this? What are tax implications of doing this? Is it even profitable? What are the risks involved? 
Anyone able to catch a long entry on that mini dump? 
[removed]
Sorry wrong sub but what the fuck is going on with bcash??
Margin longs are now 5k more than margin shorts. Stop hunting those longs will likely begin here soon.
Am I doing this right? Drew Fib retracement from ATH on Bitstamp https://imgur.com/a/qpx38YM, and the .23 level seems to be at $9,168. I tried to find the resistance everyone is talking about here, but we're a bit off from it.

So then I drew this one from the 11.7 k high https://imgur.com/a/1mYmJoE and it seems more fitting of what's going on with the 0.23 retracement at $9,055. Am I right in thinking that it's both that need to be broken, so we need to get over $9,200?
[deleted]
It's almost Monday morning and you know what that means, selling pressure.

Short @ 886X.xx , target ~8550
Is there a more beautiful site than watching misguided bears getting rekt? It sucks to lose money however people who benefit from fud and bet against amazing technologies that could move people away from the slavery of the banks deserves to lose their money
This is a double top, I should have went short.
[removed]
Time has stopped right? The fooking thing is not moving!

Edit: A mini dump, surprisingly alts are going up despite BTC indecision. 
[removed]
https://www.cointelligence.com/content/bitcoin-price-weekly-analysis-all-the-way-up-to-9800/
Hey fellas, back again with some Sunday morning Bitcoin price analysis and live trading. Open discussion formation for anyone interested. 

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PEqYMz2Xdbw](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PEqYMz2Xdbw)
Got lucky and sold my long I've had opened since Wednesday at 8890 just as the drop happened.

Opened a small 50x long at 8840 with 15% of the profit for it. Other than that I'll stay out for now.
[removed]
[removed]
Looks like someone is hurt :-)

https://twitter.com/twitter/statuses/987689702483374080
[deleted]
funny to watch this bcash pump . 
Who care got it for free anyway but itchy to dump it .

[deleted]
Daily Bitcoin Update (4/22/18) + Technical Analysis

https://youtu.be/VvAO7ZV2zOk
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Anyone holding alts should heavily consider putting some of that profit into btc for the breakout about to happen.  If btc dumps here, alts fall hard.  If there is a breakout, the immediate break up will be quite profitable.
eth is going to meet its own log downtrend line, I wonder if it will push through after 3 weeks of green
Technical correction of an overheated market - corrected 70%, more than enough in my opinion.

Tax selling is over.  That was a real thing.  I personally sold quite a large percentage of a significant stack of coins at prices I would not otherwise have sold at for this very reason.  I know of others as well.  Maybe not the main reason for the correction, but it accelerated it in my opinion.

We know of additional selling from certain ICOs, and while some of this will continue, a large amount was completed.  There was also additional selling as Gox coins were converted to fiat as required by the court.  Shouldn't see more of that until September.

The price climb makes perfect sense in the context of seller exhaustion.  The idea that there isn't buying interest in Bitcoin is hilarious.  There is more interest in building a position in Bitcoin than ever before.  There has and will continue to be steady buying, enough to support prices well above the previous all time high.  Acute selling can push the price lower, but in the abscence of acute selling the price naturally drifts higher.  Often when it does that long enough you have additional FOMO buying, but it's a mistake to think the only thing which supports Bitcoin price rises is FOMO buying the price up rapidly at the ask.

So yeah, I agree with you.
Plot twist: the whole bear market was bitcoin's idea of an April Fool's joke
the chart says 3rd weekly green candle, but it feels like a bluff
Still naysayers around though. 
Glad to see you changed direction Mike. Hope it turns out ok
What is your target? Have an under short and was waiting for a retrace to switch to long 
What’s your target on this?
How do your stops work? You're using the 'stop limit' option on bitmex and put a stop price of $8462.6?
Still in this long?
[deleted]
ballsy  
:)
Agreed. I started scaling into one at 8900 with adds up to 9220 while still holding my long from 8280. Stops are just over 9300. Volume is dropping like mad and we're still up the wedge, but man, this just keeps going up.
Never been called nuts before Chew, thanks.
Same. I tried to go for the "logical" shorts at log resistence and here atound 9k. Buy pressure is really strong. Luckily it were only hedge shorts but tbh the loss in BTC hurts almost more longterm. 
it's the wall street bonuses and tax returns finally wohooo
Dont you have any concerns regarding the log resistance ?
I thought the market would push through it way harder and faster but it didn’t do this makes me really bearish.
And if we have a big pullback to 8k here we are below the line again?!?
What are your thoughts regarding the line ?
[removed]
This is great. Mods, you have done a great job ensuring this sub remains a place for well-reasoned, respected and disciplined discussion. My hat is off to you. Looking forward to broadening the scope to include altcoins.
Glad to see it!  Excited to see the insights of the traders here with regard to alts now too.  I don’t know about anyone else but I’m here to make money, regardless of what the coin is.
[deleted]
I'm glad that are you are no longer threatened by the competition of altcoins and are allowing some discussion of them.  
Top marks goto the Mods, I’m very impressed with the quality discussion here and will look forward to threading the discussion of alts by all the good traders here.  A very welcome addition.  Many of us trade alts to get more BTC.  
If it's labeled properly (i.e. "Shitcoin Discussion"), I'm sure mostly everyone will approve.

ETH is still the most overvalued altcoin.
It's cool seeing other people's charts and opinions. But at the end of the day, it's my own chart that I consult to come up with the final verdict for a trade. I always have at least 3 technical reasons for entering a trade. My "feelings" is never one of them. That way, the market can completely go against me but at least I can say I had 3 technical reasons for making that trade. And it wasn't because I was browsing bitcoinmarkets and 3 bullish posts in a row made me go long.
There's a definite correlation between me selling and the price ~~rising~~ shooting up immediately afterwards :-/
ManBearPig to the rescue!
No, this is not the final pump. Shorting is a very bad idea nowadays. Was smart in January but not now. Cut your losses.
Don't make panic swings. Stick to your position with appropriate sl or quit trading altogether for a while until a better trade comes up.
At this rate we might just casually stroll through 9k. Zimmer frame and everything.
why are you shorting one of the biggest bull moments of 2018? You bears are can be really stubborn lol
Which is hilarious really - we could literally have people on here batting it around.
Bulls will probably say it's healthy market spread.
Yeah, the volume decline in the last candles is weird. It's like the bots must be in maintenance of something and they aren't passing so many coins back and forth.
The single candles where it switches temporarily from discount to premium in a fomo spike, then back again to discount within a candle or two later, have been very very helpful on my profit taking ladders, and makes it easier to refill the position a bit afterwards too.  June has been better for longs for dumb spikes. 
I opened a long at $8750 in my head 
Yeah, go sideways for one week.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
No such thing as left over diazepam. Just diazepam waiting  to be consumed.
This wedge been treating you better than the last couple of jumps up?  Last I saw you were gonna try some layering into shorts and long simultaneously, and it appears you've had some good chances to scalp the short layering a few times here. 
This is a feature of such white label exchange software as Alphapoint. Sources your trades from the order book of a third party exchange in order to make up for lack of liquidity.
Sounds like they've got market makers doing arbitrage trades between those order books. 
lmao remember when Gdax was $1200 off of bitfinex (~10%)
and stopped out in profit, in this choppy market I prefer that rather to ride the trend too long. Will see what 8950 level does now and look for re entry
I think it was Chewy who said it "normally" breaks through on the 4th attempt?  So this was attempt #2...

EDIT:  Looks like people think this is the 3rd attempt if you go farther back.  I was only counting the attempts over the last few days.
Good trade with stops above 9200 or 9300 if you're too afraid of getting stop hunted, not that I have the balls to short this though. 
Lower highs , bearish we will go down soon.
Don't forget the wall street bonuses. :D
Is this a meme or something? Chinese New year ended a long time ago.
I don't understand how a bear div is a sell signal. For me I'm just looking at a bullflag that was overbought and is now cooling off for a new pump. What's the TA differences between these two scenarios?
Why wouldn't you draw from the top of the wicks?
What is your position here? 

Short I’m guessing 
Why do you ignore the wicks? 
Are you seeing 8.6 as support?
2 months is a long time in crypto. If I wasn’t trading for that time I’d be tempted to hodl more of my stack than keep it in fiat
> I expect us to pull back on the weekly chart to the 7800 range

Yeah i suggest you stop trading for your own good lol
I think phycological resistance at 9k is a lot weaker than the TA resistance at either 9.1 (kumo breakout) or 9.2k (previous tops).
There are buying walls forming, the resistance will fall completely.
I think eth has been leading this general crypto pump, and btc has just been dragged along, aside from the BGD candle.

That's why I'm charting eth to see when to open a btc short.
They’ve been leading the charge since the last bottom. BTC is struggling bad. The next few months will be very interesting to see how this plays out. 
Most people I know who hold alts are not all that smart, but have made a sinificant amount of money.

I think the real smart people only hold something like BTC or ETH
If you are referring to stop limits. Then no. It doesn't. It is a bug on their website. Shows a fee for some reason. If you actually check it once it gets filled there is no fee. 
If it hits it acts the same as a market order, so yes. 0.30% for most
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Im under the same belief too... For some reason these coordinated buys this past week feel very fishy to me... Also don’t think the average retail investor is ready to jump back into crypto with the death knell december still fresh in his mind. 
>  if this was our highest point, this guy is a magican.

No he could still be wrong about most everything he said.  I personally think it was an intelligent and well reasoned analysis, but the market doesn't prove that right or wrong.  The time to judge his analysis is a the time it was written.

And of course we could reverse here and continue the bear market down to $3K...why not?    Especially with bad news coming fast and furious this year.
If it turns out to be true, it will be crazy, especially for the fomo boys.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Agreed
What's the new ui? 
Going long now is a guaranteed loss.
Yes this feels a bit like 4900 - 5000 phase, which converged slowly then had an explosive breakout, up to 6300.
Hopefully 999,900 is the top for 2020.
EST? ...nah prob UTC
It’s also worth noting that Dan initially dismissed the correlation between SPX and BTC until he started looking at them from a macro(weekly) perspective since Bitcoin trades two more days per week than regular stocks. 
If you don't mind me asking, what are these YouTube channels/podcasts? Thanks mate
Nice call.
8650 target still?
eh that's a pretty poor resistance line 
dead link
Interesting point about the unsustainable support line, 20k by June is COMPLETELY unrealistic. Going to have to be a correction soon. 
I'm 5x short here with a tight stop buy above 9k. I think if we don't break 9k this time we will need a decent correction. r/r seems good to short here
Looks more like a channel  that is now trading at the bottom. 
Took profit at 9k .. I am waiting for 8895 to be broken on BFX to enter a short since we are still technically ascending until then. good luck!

..edit.. as I typed this. 
Very nice timing. I shorted last night, panicked this morning (even though my stops were at 9050), closed it at a loss, opened a long at 8950, closed it at 9000 and opened another short at 8950 lol. Seconds after I saw your post I decided to take a little gamble and bought a few more contracts and seconds later it plummeted. Very lucky on that one. Now the question is when to close it... I'm definitely bullish, but just saw that particular opportunity to short. But if we fight back to 8900 I might consider closing it. 


Neither mex or finex got to 9056
Goodluck mate I'm too scared to open another one for now.
nice trade man, amazing entry. im already short from 8650 and 8840 and about 40% of the stack in, so im not gonna add now, but this sure is overdue for some correction.
There was talk of lambos from 3K to 19K.  Just saying in bullruns, the top can be a shitton higher than most people anticipate.
Hate that sub, bunch of easily manipulated moonboy chimps 
The next wave of newcomer euphoria hasn't even arrived. But it's coming, as it always does.
not really, it can get way worse
You cant have a better sell signal.
So better start shorting then buddy :)
That's my thought too. Once we break 9.1k solidly I'd expect longs to skyrocket. Would be a perfect time to dump it if this maximum pain theory was followed.
Yeah, everyone is still pretty shell shocked from the continual fakeouts the past 3-4 months...I'd imagine a ton of people have SL set +/- the ATH downtrend line in the 8300-8500 area.  If it dumps to there it could get real ugly.  I'm currently unleveraged long BTC with buys from 6800-7700 and long ETH with month old buys from 400-575 on the way down.  Was able to double my ETH trading stack during the (current?) downtrend and sold a 1/3 of it to pay my taxes...pretty psyched about the timing. /s
It's such a small market that whales have to get the ball rolling and then the media will pick it up. If this is deliberate then it would make sense to do so in order to get new money in to the scene.

Market cap is currenty 390b, top of the market is was 820b, so back of the envelope math says money is coming in, just not at a massive rate.
You guys put way too much emphasis on "whales". My advise is either  stop showering or stop thinking. Because these thoughts of "whales" and "pumps" will drive you mental.

It depends how much is on an exchange imho. I've a wedge on Binance but it's all trading stack so needs to be there. Anything longer term is held in a wallet.

Would I feel comfortable on another exchange like Cryptopia or Poloniex? No.
They're compliant, but I can't find anything to tell me that Kraken is regulated by anyone. Does anyone know?
What about Gemini...?
start your own exchange?
Bitstamp is not bad till they ask you lots of unnecessary questions or terminate your account for no reason 
Along these lines, is there a definitive guide to storing funds off exchange? I remember seeing a post sometime about memory wallets, diamond laser etching, and other creative options but can't find it no mo
It looks very valid if you ask me. Thing is, wedges don’t have to have the best track record with this kind of thing. I was watching a rising wedge 2 days ago on the 1h charts that ended up breaking up instead of down. 



If we do break down, I’d be surprised if we go under 8.5k to be quite honest.
It edged away rather than dumped. That's a good sign.
Bitcoin often needs to "knock" multiple times on certain levels before the door opens. We've had three knocks on 9k today; next time we'll probably burst through.
[deleted]
There are massive divergences on the short- and mid-term timeframes. Really hard to justify buying at this level. IMO, we're suckering in more longs to end the weekend, and then the pain comes on Monday.
Lower highs, a bearish scenario could follow.
You’re right, looking at lower time frames, the volume looks suspect. Sudden spikes of 500+ coins in 1-5 min followed by effortless movement in the opposite direction. 

My tinhat foil theory is whales are trying to unload coins slowly without spooking the market. So they sell a few hundred coins at a time, pull sell walls, then allow buyers to drive the price back up with low volume before unloading more coins. 


The transformation from volume to price is mediated by the order book.

That probably means the dump cleared out a decent chunk of the order book, and market buys brought the price back up before more asks filled in the resulting space.
I wonder if these small dumps are just feeler dumps. A real dump will hit stops to trigger more market sells, and it seems there wasn't much at $8863. If this doesn't range higher, I suspect the next dump will get lower to see where it can hit stops.
That means people don't want to make sell orders at this price. Bullish sign.
sellers exhaustion, as we have seen for every move back since february, price are more and more sideways since each dump
Yes, it's there. Hidden normally indicates continuance of a trend so if the 2 hr chart is in an uptrend, a hidden bullish divergence indicates the momentum is still solid/building.
I'm not sure how this is plausible when the the vast majority of exchanges still don't offer a fiat/Alt-coin pairing. Once that happens, then I could see what you're describing happening.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Did you get messages like that after the 100% gain back in February? We've only gone up 30% from the bottom, why is FOMO kicking in now instead of back then?
A couple of my buddies just told me they are finally break even and will be unloading rather than ride this volatility wave. I guess there is lots of anecdotes out there.
no, not yet.
> don't want to be affected by the price going up and down and would want to sell around the same price as I bought it

Erm, what?!
Please don’t do anything if you don’t understand simple things about trading on exchanges. Seems you have a wierd impression of how things work. Dont want you losing your BTC by mistake.
You want to use Bitcoin as a CD?
Presumably you could just buy BTC on GDAX or anywhere else at the market price, then transfer it to Bitmex and take out a 1X perpetual short - it's effectively the same as holding it in USD - although of course you need to take the funding rates into account - shorts are usually paid funding but sometimes you may need to pay. 
Just buy BTC and short the same amount? 
Use btc to buy usdt
Fun to watch, hard to participate.
But I need my retrace fill at 8008.135
Well played.. very good n patience trade, something that I need to learn!
In BTC land do you think repeated diminishing rejections is a bearish sign? I wouldn't think so unless we make lower lows after rejection, which is happening as I type this on finex
I think I switched positions 5 times today. Honestly I found it impossible to wrap my head around what was going on today. Even right now people seem to be buying up the 8.75-8.8 range with gusto - I DON'T UNDERSTAND WHY
Wanna trade? i'm stuck to a 8100 short for being stubborn and holding to my position. Now just hoping for a crash to 8500 to reduce my losses but even that will be hard to get and will end up biting the bullet @9200... 
Yea we all do...
>June 29 futures on bitmex have moved up level with spot just now. Seems like a bullish sign to me. They were 100 usd below spot last week.
>

Worth noting that during the week when futures was trading at $100 below index, bitcoin rose nearly 15%. Futures is representative of trader sentiment, which is worth very little in a heavily manipulated market. 
Wasn't that the case already for ages?  ZCash's cap is $1,049M, Monero's $4,448M, over 4 times more. This didn't happen just yesterday or today.
Seems like inversing the subs sentiment is a viable strategy.
My shorts closed at break even.
Do you use modified (crypto) or standard settings on the ichi? I've been going back and forth on which I prefer. The modified seems to signal later than the standard but as a result has less false signals.
Close'em down boys.
$8760 looking good right now. Like to the dollar almost. 
Awesome. I'm only down like 80% on all my alts.
Anyone else here longs alts and shit? I made a solid 3000% or so return on my alts even after screwing over myself on some bad misguided trades to try to accumulate more and the greedy 16 year old idiot me decided that 23000 bucks still wasn't enough. I've 'crashed' to a Lower trade worth now, still decent but nowhere near where I was. Do none of you here bother trading the alts or atleast longing them or something? I can almost confidently tell all of you that should bull season come again, bitcoin may be king but it will really be the alts once again showing hundreds of percents in growth in a crazy place. 
I think you'll get a better exit than this. Rising wedge is threatening to break down, and we should retest at least 8600. I closed my long at 8900 and I'm scaling back into one from 8800-8500. I am short from 8930 as well. 
I'm also underwater on my short. Tempted to just close my position, 
cut my losses and wait for some clearer confirmation before reentering. 
I ended up closing my short at a small loss. It may have ended up being a good position but as you say, maintaining it just felt reckless. 
Since you reference India in a lot of your posts, I want to just mention that the median HOUSEHOLD income in India is $3168.00 per year, with the per capita income being $616.00 per year. 

I think everyone should have access to crytocurrency, and I think having India temporarily ban exchanges is not a good thing in the slightest, but let's not pretend there's a lot of buying power there.
I won't attempt to speak to all points, but anecdotally for #3. I have a hodl stack. I have had it for a long time. I can't remember the last time I "google searched" Bitcoin.

I go straight to exchanges to trade or check price. I come here for news and updates. I click across to Twitter if I'm feeling masochistic etc.

I just don't see why people who are already set up to buy Bitcoin would need to "google" it?
Thank you for taking the time to spell out your thinking.  I personally don't think this amounts to "All indicators" signalling a marketplace that continues to contract.  It is clear that there has been selling and certainly market contraction in some areas as well.  You could argue that this is largely priced in by now and that growth in other areas will outpace whatever lingering contraction there is from the issues you mention.

I think that is the case actually.  I don't think all buying is equally important in the long run and I believe the most important buying is just starting and is likely to accelerate.  There are many indications to support this idea.  It's not surprising that often online in social media the idea that the buyers most influenced by social media are the most important.  I agree that the cryptomoms of the world aren't FOMOing hard right now and I agree that the flows in and out of really scammy crypto "opportunities" did and does affect the price of Bitcoin, but that type of price support was never sustainable and isn't as important as institutional buying.
So dumb money has left the market, only those truly interested (OTC buyers/institutional investors) are moving in, before FOMO begins for dumb money again. All of the things you said are already priced in IMO, they are not recent news. You're measuring the markets in metrics that are available to every average joe and making assumptions based on assumptions.
> 1.5 billion people in India. 65% are illiterate.  Bitcoin is the least of their worries. 


[deleted]
I should probably buy more 
Just say I'm short, it's simpler.
If you're saying crypto is on the decline, I think you're wrong. This thing is just getting started.
Just bought another 100k, thanks for “real” advice.
1: not necessarily, many bitcoin may enter from out of country. In fact I would say it has the potential (potential) to open a parallel economy. Which is the way thigns go in India because of the government being epically stupid with their ban on cash.

2: Similar.-

3: Yeah.

4: Please, do not quote alexa. I still have not figured out how many people actually installed their browser bar - one or two are likely. Is that thing not firefox only? How does it track mobiles? Tablets?. And that is what they base the numbers on.

5: yes. OTOH that may be banks offering.

6: Not sure. Prices went up before the ICO craze, you know.

7: And they will not go up, you know. Ever again. For bitcoin. Because of batching and Lightning.

Oh, yeah, facts. People like you - showing the intelligence of toast bred when putting together one sided facts - give the modern school system a really bad taste.
This is so biased towards the negative, its not even funny. Under the radar great strides are being made. Just becuase a dose of realism has hit, doesn't mean shit.
Mostly lagging indicators there, mostly symptoms not causes. 

India is a good point though but it's not as if they drove the previous bull market. 
Disagree completely with the ICO stuff. Those ads are targeted ads, so in all likelihood are shown to people who are already exposed to crypto. I'd be interested to see how many ICO participants have never invested in any kind of crypto asset before.

I've seen numerous ads for crypto in mainstream media and at live sports events broadcast to billions of people. Thats not going to change any time soon. 

Do we even need ICOs now anyway? So many people have been ripped off, they're usually only available at good prices to those who have already made fortunes and are looking to dump as soon as they get on exchanges. I really don't think them being cracked down upon will have a negative long term effect. 

The way I and everyone I know got into crypto was through word of mouth or by having to pay for something using it, not through some shitty 320x50 banner ad.


1 is incorrect for Pakistan at least. See the number of online traders [on lbtc](https://localbitcoins.com/country/PK) (online means fiat payments via electronic means aka via banking system in lbtc lingo).
I like your point about ICO's. Good post. 
You missed out number 8. Greed
> 1.5 billion people no longer have access to buy bitcoin in an easy way due to the india / pakistan ban of bank movements to buy crypto (they can only buy / sell in cash person to person now). This is a measurable, non-disputable contraction of the market.
> 
> 

What about this  https://cointelegraph.com/news/india-delhi-high-court-seeks-response-from-central-bank-on-recent-crypto-ban-report-says

>The High Court of Delhi has reportedly issued a notice to the Reserve Bank of India (RBI), the Ministry of Finance, and the Goods and Services Tax (GST) Council alleging that RBI’s decision to end dealings with crypto businesses violates the constitution, local news outlet Times of India reports today, April 22.


And if it were not for the huge BGD this battle for 9000 would be going on back at 7000. Lack of real volume. Unfortunately this attempt may end like the middle of March one did. We made it thru the log downtrend because that's come down from 10.5K to 8.5K.
What's bullish? People just dropped 1k in mostly market orders and the price is still under $9k. It took almost no coins to sink the price.

That is more and more effort to move the price upwards. Less and less effort to move it downwards. We likely will break $9000, but it is a bad sign. Any bad news on monday that changes seller sentiment will have outsized effects on price.
It really comes down to liquidity, doesn't it?

You've been at this a lot longer than me, but I can certainly appreciate your frustration with the whole process. I've been thinking a lot about where this whole thing is going, and how long it will take to get there. In my opinion there are a few things that absolutely must happen before this market can function sanely:

- Regulation. The powers that be throughout the world economies need to establish like-kind regulation on the crypto markets (see, Exchanges), and establish a means of preventing blatant market manipulation. Is a time-delay the answer? Limits on trades per hour? I don't know, but that's step one.

- Regulation will lead to the second most-needed thing: More new money in the market. Regulation should lead to ETFs, which will make investing in crypto more palatable to the layman who wants to put 5% into crypto to diversify their portfolio.

- The third thing, which I think could help the other two if it happens sooner, rather than later is front-end usability of crypto currencies. Buying things with crypto, performing atomic swaps, and purchasing crypto needs to just "work". That functionality still isn't there yet, though I know it's in the works on many levels. The very thing that makes a decentralized currency so attractive also makes it incredibly tedious to work with. Streamlining that process would do wonders for widespread adoption. I don't have a clue how that will happen, but whoever can figure it out will change everything.

Best of luck with your time off. Hopefully you'll return in the future.
See you in 5 
Well people, here we see a classic case of bi-polar-L14dy, probably caused by a high dose of alcohol and marihuana. These effects tend to wear off in a few hours, so see you soon in bullmode chap!
Someone else told me to replace 'whale manipulation' with 'good traders with lots of money to liquidate stupid leveraged positions' and it makes me feel better. 

But if you do bail, hey bud, can you not crash the market again? 
Pity, I like reading your posts, but I feel your sentiment.
If you're really heading out, we'll miss you.
See you in a few days :]
markets doesn't move according to my feelings -> market manipulated

[deleted]
Que. 
hodl with stop loss
I entered buy orders in the 8500's and 8600's for overnight. Personally, I wouldn't be surprised to see a retrace, but the market to me feels bullish enough that I don't think we'll fall through the ATH support line overnight.
I think you are better of just hodling them atm.
Hodl, in theory like any sunday there will be a dump but followed of a reversal in monday to continue the uptrend this next week
Ignore those two first volume bars at your peril! Otherwise volume is stable, as your moving average shows. Sure, there was a lot of profit taking at 9k, but that's hardly surprising. I just don't think you can compare that volume to the first two bars. 
Wasn't really expecting it until we reached here. Given the current circumstances, I think a breakdown is definitely on the table. Not necessarily, but this is what my experience suggests me.

Moreover, we will be starting a new week tomorrow, so there is a high level of uncertainty. 
It's blowing my mind that people are talking about the halving again. It was such a huge topic last time it happened, and it's just weird to see it coming up again. FWIW, I definitely think it leads to increased price, but it takes a while to kick in. ;)
The next halving won't even happen until 2020
Buyers give 0 fucks. 

They see the price recovering and they have $$$ in their eyes. They see $9,000 BTC that they'll be able to sell for $20K any day now.

The fomo is strong. 

Now, I'm not saying they're correct. But that's the phycology that's in play.  
It's not a rejection if we keep making higher lows
RSI cooling a little on the 1 hr, we may make one more push for it.
Considering we topped out at 9.0 on the run from 7.3 it's a pretty strong signal for a genuine recovery that we are now at least wicking that level again. I think this one is do or die, of it ends up being a trap it's almost certain we see sub 6k. 
No, it didn't. A company has taken it to court claiming it is unconstitutional and they are in a court process. The court has not reversed anything. You are reading news to pump and dump. Not real news. Here is real news which is just a standard court case anyone can file and does not indicate they have any chance of winning: https://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/business/india-business/rbi-circular-barring-banking-service-for-crypto-currencies-challenged-in-hc/articleshow/63868562.cms

**Edit**: people are seriously downvoting me for providing the real news and not the fake news crap about the HC saying the crypto ban is violating the constitution. People on this sub are delusional. They willingly bury their heads in the sand.
Seems minor, but definitely positive. Lots of potential investors in India.
I noticed that too, 12 hours ago if btc went lower it took the alts. Not so this morning.
a few things. Don't put that much trust on diagonal lines. Combine it with RSI, MACD and the like to draw conclusions if needed . Ascending and descending triangles are also to be trusted.

 Two - If this really breaks down, we are looking probably at 8300 first stop, 7800 second. 

Third, why its this a wedge and not an ascending triangle we are about to break (up or down) ? 

Forth, and ive just noticed, you MUST use log for these thing.


> FOMO honey badger

lol, well done
lol this guy was talking about shorting the bottom 10 days ago and that BTC will dump to 3-4k. then he thought 8.2-8.3k was the top and a breakdown was imminent, and of course he's still calling for shorts. i mean i guess eventually you'll be right, but it's just funny. 
Might be a good day to buy a lottery ticket my friend.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
> RemindMe! December 20th, 2018


This is my belief as well, maybe not 4k but sub 6k. But my expectation is that we have not hit bottom yet....would love to be wrong but only time will tell
Agreed. Breaking the log down trend line is just one aspect of the market turning around, it's not the conclusive measure of a bearish versus bullish market. Just look back at 2014. It took 4 or 5 hits to the line to break it before we formed a nice FOMO bulltrap followed by much lower lows (broke the line around $500 and proceeded to bottom out at $150). 

There may be more upside here but the alt pumps, lackluster volume and instant bullish sentiment is not all that convincing. 
I don't know man. So much wrong here. Seems bearish around here to me, your comment as a prime example.  $4k? That seems wildly  unrealistic.

It looks to me like the capitulation will happen on the bear side.  At some point it becomes too expensive to short.  
People here have short memories. As soon as they saw it was time for another bounce, they started starting spurting out all this bullish sentiment and stupid predictions, even if they didn't believe it themselves.

I saw people claiming we have a good chance of hitting 15k on this run, followed by a ton of upvotes. I think its simply down to a lot people going long, and they want to try and support their decision with bullish claims.
I also look at it from a perspective of time, not price/mcap. BTC has seen a multi-year bear market in it’s short lifetime (granted under a different circumstance). After the parabolic run up in Dec, do we really think a 4 month bear market is all we’ll see? 
RemindMe! 4 months "test"
more like $6k
Wouldn't get your hopes too high.
What is this "whales" name? Seeing you know his exact trading objectives, you must know him on a first name basis.
Thank you, sir whale whisperer.

Steven Irwin Style ( RIP to legend ) 
And what, you think retail is really providing the liquidity to soak up sells like they're nothing? There's more than one whale in the sea. 
Or he is accumulating further with the drops. 

No way to know. 

You cant also prove its the same guy. Easily could be different big , non whale sized investors. 
a bigger whale is accumulating whatever the smaller whale is deaccumulating so that the smaller whale wont reaccumulate at lower prices.
Another dump absorbed.
I think whales have been trying to do exactly that but without much success (yet). Look at the attempt at 9k 4 hours ago, 760+ market buys in less than a minute on bfx, but still rejected. 
Thinking of hedging my long with a smaller short, decent spot here, mostly at the top of the wedge still.  Would make things feel less risky if we go down and my bids start filling.
Good luck. Seems like you might need it. I'd exit before 9:30 EST tomorrow when the big money becomes available again.
2 times on a row has it done this. On a meta scale what bitcoin has been doing it's "do the same three times then the polar opposite" . So I expect a pump.
username checks out
It never existed in the first place because it is confirmation bias.
That was Saturday, been and gone and the first one at the weekend for a fortnight.
Perhaps we did dip compared to where the Monday pump will put us.
There's too many ways to draw that wedge, it's broken down in a few configurations already. This is why I lately have been learning to use the Ichimoku cloud, which tells you stuff without any bias.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/SIlcovQz/

Testing it as resistance on the 15m. We'll probably bear flag along it for a while. Then who knows. 
loled at the "lesson" part. great vid.
desperate Ver sockpuppet
The toxic tribalism of "Us vs Them", "Core vs Cash" is clearly clouding your judgement.

You're literally just shit-posting speculative garbage.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Do you ever entertain the possibility that you're wrong?
If anything it's just returning to previous levels after dipping lower during BTC's bottom... still only 0.14BTC/BCH
Some people like bigger blocks, and not the direction Adam Back has taken Btc. Ver is just too good a red herring and no actual criticism of BCHs developments are happening because of all the focus on him. 
Because some of us trade on longer time frames than a minute chart.

We've gone up $2000 in 10 days.  Clearly no buying pressure.
Volume dropping off as we reach the top of the huge 4h wedge. I'm scaling into my short from 8900-9220 and set a $200 trailing stop on my long. 
With each attempt to break 9k, the price dumps less and less.  Soon we will be close enough that a $200-$300 BGD will break us through.  At least that's been the trend these last few days.
I'm pretty sure there's more than one month between December and April.
We wont hit 9100.
It applies and always will. In the 80s peopel started using trend following systems, then everyone started using them so they stopped working. In 2000s , HFT was a big trend then everyone started using it so it was not profitable anymore https://www.ft.com/content/d81f96ea-d43c-11e7-a303-9060cb1e5f44

and so on and so on, the market is affected by the observer effect like physics. This is also the reason a market never can be "solved" by a computer like a game of chess
Technical kumo breakout is when the lagging span leaves the cloud, rn at >10k. Has to get past the kijun sen first.
Slightly off topic: you could convert your BTC to ETH and use that as collateral to borrow DAI stable currency from yourself. You do this using https://makerdao.com/

You can then use your DAI and buy any other currency you like, on e.g. Bitfinex or Bancor: https://bancor.network

Edit: I have done it, and it works. I took out small loan to try this system when ETH was at 850. So now I've got an underwater loan LOL. Luckily it's a very small amount that I was ready to lose to the experiment.
Kraken will do this for you if you simply deposit bitcoin and buy more on margin. I don’t see how the tax implications would be any different than if you had had USD as collateral, unless you get liquidated: then the sale of your collateral would be a capital gain or loss since it wasn’t USD you were losing. Not a CPA!
Crypto Bobby on YouTube discussed this a few hours ago, if you are interested. 
Yes of course it's profitable if you buy BTC at the current market price and sell it in the future for a higher price.  If you sell it for a lower price, it isn't profitable and of course must factor in interest on your loan.  
That’s what SALT was supposed to do but it has been slow to roll out the loans.
No, but I was trying to decide which is more brutal, this or getting my back waxed.
quality comment
Fomo. 
it's catching up from being crushed in ratio back to where it was, not much really. 
Pump and dump
back to the pegged 0.2 ratio i think
Ver and Wu + miners hoarded 90%+ of the supply. illiquid market.
I heard on telegram that ver paid bezos 80 million to have Amazon accept bch
Is this a significant difference? What have ratios been right before other obvious stop hunting candles?
Its that linear ? It seems like linear. You can't use linear with that. 
No, we can just skip both and go straight to $9,200 ;) /s
Any specific data sources you're looking at? Thanks!
Hell yeah man! I bet you wouldn't care if the price went to shit because you BELIEVE in the tech!

No, no matter bulls or bears, losing money does not feel good and you should not feel good if others lose money. 
>move people away from the slavery of the banks

lol
You talk like a bull run is a sure thing. It isn't. We could drop a grand from here and head straight to 3k.

And don't be mean.
I don't think they're betting against these 'amazing' technologies lol, they're just betting on the fact that it may still be overvalued. No one here really deserves to lose their money.
I am a bull but let’s not gloat. karma can be a bitch 
For the next 5-10 years, Bitcoin will be a tool for moving money _towards_ the big banks, and the big players. The market is designed to make you lose your money.

Don't get me wrong, I truly believe in the tech. But it's gonna get worse, before it gets better again. And I'm not necessarily referring to the price, but to how players in the market will act.
ugg. You short the market when you are trading to retain or grow your fiat value, or increase your total bitcoins.. even when the market is moving down. There is nothing bad about this. Some take it to far but that is their own (bulls & bears) gamble. None the less, the open market is about taking opportunities.. no one shorting bitcoin is doing anything "wrong" .. they're just losing money right now. But they also may have doubled or tripled their bitcoin stash the last few months. Trading bitcoin properly has nothing to do with how good the tech is nor how much one believes in it.
I'll watch for you on @bitmexrekt
We need to go below 8600 for that no? 
We will see new lows soon.
Oy, this is absurd. Alts have to propose some sort of use case to be relevant. Bitcoin has its use case, sound money. In order for alts to capture this use case, their communities have to prove that their tech is better (hint: it's not) *and* they have to grow their networks organically to match that of BTC (or just fork BTC to capture the network but that tactic has probably seen its hay day). Orthogonal use cases (smart contracts and the like) will likely not supersede the money use case in value.

tl;dr Bitcoin is not going to 10% dominance 
the tuna sub trader getting salty ..ouuuch
I've posted this before but I'll post it again because it's relevant and I still feel this way even after some time.

[Why I Am Still A Bitcoin Maximalist](https://theoryofself.com/why-i-am-still-a-bitcoin-maximalist-2fb98d33ed21)
t. 17 yr old
If it wasn't for bitcoin there wouldn't be an ecosystem. It's still top dog, it's not going anywhere. Unlike you, gtfo. 
Doubt it goes anywhere near 10% anytime soon. Most crypto use cases proposed by altcoins are not economically viable use cases. Still, BTC might not remain the #1 crypto forever. 
I agree. Bitcoin's been dead since the end of March.

edit: this just in. It ain't
looking to buy a small amount too for a quick trade to transfer to another exchange, when are you planning to exit this trade?
> Lol why bch mooning 

Lol no moon for BCH
I dont understand how people are still buying into this coin
CEO of Bcash "pleasantly surprised"
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Omg we haven’t taken a big step up for like a whole 2 days, so boring! Lol come on man...
Won't happen.
* Sure why not.
* Like fuck I won't.
* Yes of course.
* Fuck yes I will.
* Fuck no I won't.
Are you York780 or just copying tweets Check out @YORKyor780’s Tweet: https://twitter.com/YORKyor780/status/988136264925839361?s=09
thinking of shorting it hard
You sound like an idiot, considering you could have sold at a .4 ratio.
[removed]
[deleted]
Just imagine not perfectly executing every trade opportunity the market has to offer

Lmao just lol.
you don't make money chasing pumps after they pumped for a week. 

you make money being patient for your turn for a pump 
I don't have to imagine 
0.001 BCH = Ramen Noodle
0.001BTC = Tuna sub



Nobody cares if you make cents from your lunch money investment. 
It's all I will do tonight. 
When you don't think for yourself and its dealing with money... you deserve to lose it.
Yeah! Gosh, it's like the everyone just suddenly realized that Roger Ver and Craig Wright *aren't* totally full of shit. Honestly, I'm pretty sure these two are some of the smartest minds in the space today. Thank God Craig admitted that he is Satoshi, so we can finally put that mystery to rest. 

I, for one, welcome our new BCash overlords.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Shit that's tempting..  I usually miss the timing to flip the alts back and forth massively in these situations.
it's pushing through right now, isn't it?
Didn't it already break the log ath resistance at $525?

Edit: Nvm, I see you're using Bitfinex. I was using Gdax
Thanks for that. Good to hear someone being bullish based sensibly on reality. I get fed up with all the twitchy naysayers who only ever look at their TA charts and come out with negative predictions again and again. They seem to revel in negativity. 
As evidenced by rounded bottoms.
Great rational analysis thanks
This is one of the best analysis of the market I have read in here for while.  

Newbies should read this again and again until it all sinks in.
one on the things I was thinking about is that sellers who had to sell some of their stack to cover tax bills might not have additional capital to reinvest back into crypto

that begs the question then, where is the additional capital going to come from? if it isn't going up it will have to come down because of the inherent inflation which is $2 million per day!
Naysayer checking in
>How do your stops work? You're using the 'stop limit' option on bitmex and put a stop price of $8462.6?

Yep. 
>Still in this long?

No, closed at $9188 [here.](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e8qok/z/dxv0sic) 
How do you get rekt with 5% stops?
Well, if you believe him, a $1mm short is actually on the smaller side of his positions 
I believe /u/MikeXBT is managing a hedge fund.
if you followed closely, it was a $2m short with 5% loss. So around $100k in losses.
Hes had a bunch of winning trades lately, and you point out a singular trade.  Are you retarded or just assume hes retarded and has no capital management, or stops?  Pretty safe to assume you are retarded i guess.
Af
There's potential for more gains in the short term, but the market will see a significant correction eventually. 

Whether it's $9,000 to $8,000, $10,000 to $9,000, or $11,700 to $10,000, it's on the horizon. 

So maybe crazy isn't the right term. But reckless would certainly apply. 
Closed mine at 8950 for break even, wish I had closed it  at the bottom of the big red candle a couple of hours ago obviously. If we don't bust out past 9050 in the next few hours I might re-open it. Everything is pointing to short this, but climbing back from that drop earlier so quickly is really messing with me.
I get that you have a bearish sentiment but you'll need to be more substantive than that.  It's otherwise just an emotional shit post.
[removed]
Yes, these are valid concerns, and why we will be keeping such a close eye on it. Thanks for expressing your worries.

Be sure to report anything in this or any other thread that you find is against our rules. It really helps.
It has nothing to do with feeling threatened. This sub was started with one particular idea in mind - trading bitcoin - and branching out from that, even in a small way, requires a lot of careful thought. Since many of our active users now also trade other cryptos, now might be the time to include some discussion of those with the same quality standards we apply now.
lol
I dare you to say something positive
It's the second coin in market cap. The market is the market
That's BCH
ecks dee
Yes I have been practicing trading both instrument the last month, and my feeling is that if you can get lower buys(since the order book is thinner == bigger dumps) on futures and hold on to them without stop losses, it feels that it's less risk(= more potential upside since lower price) to buy them with low leverage but bigger positions
LOL
I wasn’t able to execute my longs, but I was able to get some shorts in.

I was able to short at , 8935, 8975, 8998, 9014, 9041, and 9056 with 9056 being my biggest entry. 

I closed all my shorts between 8935-9014 for a decent profit but kept my 2 shorts open.

I should have kept them open and stuck to my plan because I tend to panic close often, but I’ve taken too many losses recently to risk it and with this buy pressure it’s a little terrifying. Kraken is also trading at a premium which is irritating. 


Are you going to long XBT? looks like its going to 9300 atleast
thanks 
wow

so they provide  an entirely  built exchange  and  I have to do  a few customization here and there if I get this correctly


and I thought these guys had to build  an entire exchange  from the ground  
what does that mean ?
All I'm saying it's a bit more than usual, and in the recent weeks the $50-70 positive arbitrage on Kraken have been followed by fairly big moves. And yes, I do remember $1200 arb at Gdax ;)

It's not unreasonable to think that big players do their market buying across multiple exchanges, and only place their "final" move on Bitfinex which tends to lead the market. This would be considered some kind of front-running technique I guess.
Yeah with resistance the r/r for a short is better but still scary because it could pump out of nowhere.
That was in reference to diagonal resistance. 

And it was mostly in the context of "if the market is up at resistance for the 4th time, buyers aren't fucking around."

I wouldn't put a firm number of attempts required to break horizontal resistance. As long as the market doesn't make a lower local low below $8,600 after an attempt to break $9,000 resistance, then there's nothing to be concerned about. 
Attempt #3 just happened.
Wasn’t there an attempt last month on the way back up from. 11.8 before being rejected and sent down to below 7k? That would make this attempt 3 no?

Edit: Around 21st March if you look at the daily chart.
[removed]
I clearly see higher lows, but I guess we only see what we wanna see :) 
and us tax returns
Yes.
It really just depends. You can see his chart shows a 4h bear div that resulted in a tiny pullback...we could do the same here or we could end up pulling all the  way back to $7800. 


Yes I often get that question. Wasn't sure about it myself even after researching but observing so many divs now I feel much more comfortable playing a div where the wicks dont agree with the candle bodies.

I went into more detail about it last week: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8b4twg/daily_discussion_tuesday_april_10_2018/dx4xokv/
Well I never sold all my spot coin, but right now I am short hedged and bearish on the 4 hour timescale.  I would like to increase my short sometime in the next 2 hours.  The last 2 hour candle was very low volume red so I figured I didn't need to increase the short hedge right at this bear div confirmation and can wait for a better entry.

The daily close above the log downtrend was our first evidence that our bear market could be over.  To convince me that the bear market is over, I would also like us to break higher highs.  IMO 10k would be a great higher high to break.
/u/joyrider5 is a consistently strong contributor to the sub and presents useful TA without bias.

The "we get it, you're short" type of commentary is especially annoying here.
RSI is based on closing values of candles, not max/min.
Yes... I don't think we'll go below the log at $8.5k in the short term.  If we do, then it'll be... well... it'll be bad for the bulls
80% of my holdings are in cold storage. 
This probably has to do with how "inorganic" and choppy btc has been since 11.7, everybody has ptsd, and rightly so. Look at eos for example, that's a "normal" crypto chart.
Real smart people have already bought their under 20 million marketcap shitcoins again. 

Imagine already having 300% returns on some since the start of this month. Must be a sign of a low IQ to do this magic trick over and over again. 
Yeah, the only point of trading alts (including ETH IMO) at this point is to get more BTC. Some of them will survive but who knows which at this point. Withstood the teat of time = only Bitcoin, Litecoin, Dash and Dogecoin at this point.
Really?  I'm pretty sure I'm getting billed for my stop limits.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
The new overview of people's comment history for one. Thankfully you can still access the legacy one. 
You say it as if you have it all figured out. Your post carries no weight thus the downvote. 
one final stop hunt shakeout here and then a push is my guess
I think that would be widely accepted as McAfee being correct though ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯ 
EET 
No problem, just search the chart guys on YouTube, very popular.https://youtu.be/Mv-kvmWAwPw

Crypto voices is on soundcloud.
Listen to Show 38 Part II: Paul Sztorc - Bitcoin Hivemind & Drivechain by Crypto Voices #np on #SoundCloud
https://soundcloud.com/cryptovoices/show-38-part-ii-paul-sztorc-bitcoin-hivemind-drivechain
nope, 9250 target still
I scalped a little high leverage short from 8830 but the buy pressure surprised me and I closed it @ 8780 (I know, barely anything). You think this has room to go?
Thanks, fixed 
Lol. Did u close ur short? 
Depending what ur entry is, just set ur stops so ur able to take some what of profit. If this shit goes to the floor you have a very nice entry point. 

I’m personally holding mine open but my advice isn’t nearly the best. 
Kraken :)
Worked out nicely 
So we are officially in a bull run then?
It's far from neutral too. BTC largely ignored, verge and iota pumped hard, bch shit upon. They pick all the losers.
LMAO, this gave me a good laugh.
I am just waiting to change my flair to bullish.
Sorry but i politely disagree with the second part of your post. Market cap going up does not mean new money is coming into the market. In my opinion these are profits from the 20k that are being reinvested. So basically this money comes from the bagholders and i doubt the normies who got rekt will reinvest while they are still 50% underwater of the last investment.

Regarding whales to have the ball rolling, they do it for profit but to take profits they have to sell... remember end of 2017, lot of people were screaming new paradigm and then what?
Personally i am not wearing a tinfoil hat (hate conspiracies, love logic). It's just to name the originator of a 500+ market buy order. Name it group, entity, bot, whatever you prefer.
[deleted]
If you are going to store your bitcoin and don't plan to move it actively, the best you can do it's to just save the wallet and never use it.
im hoping it'll hold up a bit better since its on a bigger time frame but not really counting on it.

Also think anything below 8.5k is hopeful but certainly possible
Until it isn't...
Bear market is over, you had your turn to make outlandish claims and to be sorta right; now its the bulls turn.

10k in 3 days
I don’t see what you are trying to accomplish. I have you seen consistently on this daily discussion just pulling things out of your ass, acting as if you and you alone know exactly what is going to happen. News flash: You don’t have any more of a clue than the rest of us. 


Maybe if you would actually back up what you say with some technical or fundamental analysis, we might be more inclined to listen, but right now, the kinda stuff you’re posting is worse than shitposting. 
By which you mean continuously higher highs for a week?
So that’s a bad sign right? The whales are selling, and they probably know more than we do. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
For me it seems a whale dumps not to bring the price down, but to sell a lot of coins for the highest possible price. Can be deaccumulation of a large whale, first try to sell as many coins as possible at the top to bring the price down than. 
Cool, thanks. Then maybe it's not out of the question another test of 9K before 8.5K?
This is true; I suppose what I meant to get at is the shift in some pretty fundamental assumptions that a decoupling of BTC would force in trading and how abruptly a shift like this could precipitate.  Not that it is happening now or when but that it could really happen at all.  But as BTC dominance lowers, there will definitely be questions as to what alts are eating BTCs marketshare more than others -- a lot of the same questions that could be avoided before that will find answers.
For my group, having these same discussions, enough time has passed (for them) to consider it possible that a correction has occurred an no real bear market will occur. 

Also, it comes up in random conversation now absent me, whereas last summer, I was trying to explain it to them like they were 5 and failing. This adds legitimacy for them.

Finally, /u/onlytherealadvice , may I suggest adding "bearish" or "saving you all from bitcoin since 2018" to your name?
Maybe because of the ATH downtrend line breaking?
These are all people who figured it was a bubble when it burst at 20k. Certainly no aweness of the technical analysis, but all work in IT advisory. To me it's just a small early indicator of the types who might FOMO in this time, last time the only people asking me we're Farmers and Uber drivers 
Yeah I seriously doubt so many of these anecdotes. People are like "I have so many friends asking about crypto and are finally starting to get in." 

Nah, I've quite literally had 0 new people talk to me about bitcoin and altcoins since February. 


Oh what a coincidence!
I want to pay 8950$, get 1 btc, sell this btc some time in future for 8950$ plus whatever fees. 
I want btc and not usdt.
> something that I need to learn!

You can learn it by practicing the market as much as you can (of course with smaller amounts) and then reflect on your performance.

It might help you understand the dynamics of the market more easily, thus improving your decision making and other skills. All the very best! :)
It could be. With such rejections, if there is no new money entering the market, the traders could end up feeling exhausted, and when that happens, the price tends to go downwards due to selling.

Kindly note that I am not a TA expert. This is my personal experience.
In the beginning of the day, all roads were leading towards 9k+ 

As the day went on, buyers got weaker and bounces got weaker and dip wasn’t getting bought up as strong.

This shit isn’t easy
[deleted]
r.i.p. in peace
What's your thoughts on where we're at right now? You a believer or staying sceptical?
I'm not sure about that. I'm a trader (albeit a very minor one) and to me it seemed highly unlikely that the price would be lower at the end of June. In fact I made a small profit by going long on futures.

Price was higher 
can be until it isnt
If you double the settings you shift the kumo from a higher timeframe and return slower moving averages, so, yes, you're going to get smoother, delayed signals. But why not just trade on a higher timeframe? 

Then there's the issue of using different figures for the kijun and the lagging span B. The kijun is the baseline value, so it means your plotting a TK average using a three-way comparison... where's the logic?

Edit: prepositions...
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Rip my man I assume u got in real late in the game where delusional pumps were at their height 
second this 
...exactly? So who's buying?

I'm sure you're not doubling up at $9k 
Google search usually indicates new money which is necessary for price to continue moving up
> I go straight to exchanges to trade or check price

Exchange traffic is also down.
OTC buyers will be waiting to buy the 165k coins off of MtGox. They will not be buying here. They can wait until september. 
And they poop in the street. 
I never would short in a manipulated market.
Additionally,

1) Other commentators have made points about how insignificant India is. China is priced In.

3/4) all his points about search terms and internet rankings will all be lagging indicators. They will only increase when the price increases further and interest starts to rise. You will be left far behind if you wait for those to pick up first. 

7) Batching by exchanges alone would have drastically decreased this. Hopefully wth lightning we NEVER see the same network congestion


He gave an extreme detailed post on fundamentals and you said there's stuff "under the radar" lol. Why can't you list anything? 
Which under the radar great strides are you referring to?
>  doesn't mean shit.

Don't try so hard.  I would say that 3 billion people not being able to buy Bitcoin now does mean shit...and quite a bit more than that.
lagging yes, but this pump has been going on for a while now. the lagging indicator should be showing something by now

No, but US / Euro was already saturated. It was on the news already everyday for 6+ months. Hell, taking an international flight and the ads in the plane were crypto. It has been everywhere in those regions, so it is much more saturated. 

Crypto needs markets to grow into to find a continual supply of new buyers.
> Do we even need ICOs now anyway? 

Maybe not ICOs specifically, but I do feel that smart contracts are the way of the future for stocks in a company.  It makes so much more sense to have your shares in a blockchain, with 24/7 access, than the hoops you presently have to jump through.  I'm thinking of this from the perspective of if you have stock options or free shares in the company you work for.
No, it is correct: https://finance.yahoo.com/news/pakistan-central-bank-bans-banks-125214398.html

LBTC is person to person which is harder to regulate. It is also less secure for the buyer, requires KYC, and can land the trader in trouble. Of course though people will still do it, but they will do it in much smaller numbers than if it was completely legal and easy.
That is fake news. I already posted the real news article in the discussion today. It is a standard court case that anyone can file and the high court has not made any determination. The existence of the court case does not give any new information or indicate that anything is unconstitutional.
With that reasoning we should just ignore all the large red dildos we have had that brought us down to this price too.
Dude I don't know what you're trying to achieve but it seems like you want the price to go down really badly lol. 
Crypto news articles have been much more sideways or bullish recently, and outsiders are starting to get interested again. Just look at growth in crypto subs, the # of people online, the number of comments per thread, etc. People are starting to get legitimately interested again and that is how the next bull run will start. Market sentiment is everything. 
Thanks for the writeup!

I will return. I just need a breather. But I do not support this bullshit anymore.
I just don't see how these fucked up candles make any sense.

I took a look at that chart posted with all the market buys. I do not support this! I supported decentralization, not manipulation. I should have sold at 20k, I was greedy. I am not greedy anymore.

This can go to 100k without me, I don't care.
he'll be back, he just needs to take a break for a bit

knowing him it could be anywhere from 5 minutes to a week or two lol 
Eh, he'll be back.

Even if he does sell, he'll either fomo in at 3k or at 12k. You don't simply quit the corn.
c'mon now...you've been around long enough to see this "organic" isn't so organic.
We went from 6k to 9k in 2 weeks.
Its just so unpredictable now. Cause we have to wait for 2018 to end then look at 2019 and where we will be then. Going to be super interesting times. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
10k is the real psychological barrier, real FOMO will kick in after that.
I'm all BTC now for this reason alone...fomo is going to be massive if 9k breaks and confirms..
I just don't understand why we can't break 9k after several tries now. Although I guess maybe this will be the time. I just find it strange that the dips get eaten up so quickly but we just can't get past 9k - makes me think that if and when we do break the rest will be "thin air" as you said the other day.

But who is FOMOing? It's not the same group of people as last time. 
Yea I think it's actually bullish. Whenever it just sits there right below knocking at the door so to say, it breaks through eventually.
Wow, price on BFX has been at 8939 for what feels like 20 minutes now. It's like a Mexican standoff.
They are downvoting you because you jump conclusions. The onyl answer is YES. It COULD - note I do not say likely. But someone opened it to a court and a couret has to decide and it is POSSIBLE that this may be the reversal of a trend. This was the question. Not what you answered.
Yes it did apparently:

https://cointelegraph.com/news/india-delhi-high-court-seeks-response-from-central-bank-on-recent-crypto-ban-report-says

Edit: It seems we're citing the same source. It says a notice has been served. Why do you say the court didn't do it?
Yes of course.  Any genuine bad news is downvoted and suppressed by many here.
And both pumps before were after alt pumps .Of course there is no pump now, but it looks like it could happen any second now.
I use log all the time and I seem to have forgotten to switch to log this time, but its no biggie in this range there isnt any noticable difference for that wedge.

Yeah, well I try to analyse the market and say my opinion of where this **might** be heading. As we are / have been in a downtrend the standard has been to sell / short the DCBs so thus all the shorts, but lately its has been more gambling than confident trading.
Not unrealistic at all? What if the stock market crashes and we go into recession? It'll crash eventually, that's just how markets work. What if the US Gov seizes Tether's assets like they seized egold's assets or like how they shut down the liberty reserve? More likely than not.

This market cycle isn't over, imo. We just have a higher reluctance to sell right now but that'll easily change. This rise is extremely unsustainable.
If we go down to 6k again i dont think we'll stop just there.
It could be a woman. 
we dont know yet which whale is the bigger one ;\) 
It could go either way but more short term downside risk than upside, which is why I'm net short right this second.  If it shoots up, I'm fine with covering for a small loss.
I'll exit based on current market conditions, not on fantasies (or fears) of the future.
Interesting. I’m probably not active enough on this sub these days to have seen any variations
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Hey thanks mate! Really do appreciate that and hope to interact with ya in future vids!
Curious... were you the gentleman with that indicator that counts large and small sized orders on Mex and tallies them up? If so, may I offer a suggestion if you haven't coded the indicator for this... I see so many orders less than 10 contracts one after the other. If you haven't added a filter for that, I think it would improve the usefulness, overall, if it were. I can't really help with the filter outside of those remarks... just my 2 cents.
This your old long from 6k range?  If so, perfect timing for such a stop IMO. 
What is BGD? newb question :) Google doesn't seem to return anything relevant on it. Many thanks!


And when we do you’ll be crying like a baby about tether and manipulation.
When you hit $9000 over and over again, eventually the dam will break


Someone’s in an underwater short. Stop posting the same useless comment
Where did you buy your crystal ball?
This is a huge bull trap. I say we still retest 11.7k in the next few weeks. 
What if I use the money in the stock market or any other investment? Are there any strategies out there? Anyone I can learn from? 
If I buy it now for 9K and then sell it in 8 months for 18K, would that be a taxable event? I'm guessing short term capital gains
I don't know who down voted you this is what SALT does. You are right though they are laughably slow to actual lend money.
[removed]
How does this pegging work?
Source?
Sounds like the troll box content you can expect on telegram. 
I heard he paid us govt 80 billion to replace USD 
This is actually very insignificant when you compare the ratio to what it was earlier this year. Not saying that it won't happen, but the number of longs is nothing special or extreme. 
> I bet you wouldn't care if the price went to shit because you BELIEVE in the tech!

believing in the tech means that you also believe it won't go to shit. 
Yes it is a sure thing. How is it so hard for you negative Nancy's to see that? Tax situation is over, sellers are exhausted, bulls are jumping into trades in huge numbers, bear margin traders getting liquidated daily, more news and spotlight on bitcoin in the media, I could go on and on. It is clear as day that we are heading into probably the biggest bullrun since Dec 2017
He's back! 

Nice to see you playing nice with alt trolls :p
[removed]
Put a stop at 9000 but might very well exit earlier.
Reverse the situation.

Imagine the dominant bitcoin had 32mb blocks with a fleshed out scaling plan including successful testing of GB+ blocks , support by every major crypto business, project, and service, guaranteed sub-cent fees and a more the merrier growth strategy for true global adoption.


Now imagine some upstart devs forked off and reduced block size to 1mb, heavily restricting transactional capacity to create a fluctuating fee market intended to produce long term fees in excess of $100+ driving users to a second layer system of fee taking government regulated financial intermediaries they call “hubs”.

Would this new high fee coin see any traction whatsoever?


It needs to be understood that the current BTC price is the result of incumbency, not merit. Any suggestion that the market could never come to the realisation that the Blockstream/Core redesign of bitcoin was a mistake is pure cult ideology.

BCH is gaining against BTC for very sound fundamental reasons, rational traders need to position themselves to ideally profit or at minimum protect their holdings in the event of a switch.


Im gonna start shorting it I think
The market is routing around mismanagement of the protocol by the incumbent dev team.
Dude I am long from $8,000 for almost a one good week now, I had multiple opportunities to take my 12.5% gains at $9,000, I didn't. So yeah it is getting boring for me at least to watch red candles after each candle hitting $9,000.
> Fuck yes I will.

Me too.

for about 30 seconds 
Not excellent, or on topic.
It's a good time to short it, isn't it.
Funny but none of them are devs. Kind of like a Red Herring. 
[not yet](https://www.tradingview.com/x/1giQiULy/), I have it at 665 on bitfinex. Almost overbought on the 1d as well
The inflation is a lot more than that.  About 1800 coins times the price.  I think that is a good way to think about things.  If you don't think there is $20 Million per day of demand for new coin, the price is high at over $10k/btc.  I personally believe there is a lot more demand than that and that there is enough demand to buy up the new supply at much higher prices if that is the only supply to absorb.
What if the price continues to crash below 8462 - won't you get liquidated if it's a big crash? (as opposed to using stop markets where it will be forced to sell at 8462). And do you have "post only" and "close on trigger" checked?
While i have no real reason to doubt that Mike is trading high volume, i highly doubt anybody managing a hedge fund would go around posting their trades on reddit.
$5k if he uses 20x leverage.
Can you stop going around calling people retarded idiots?

*Be excellent to eachother.*
I got a strong feeling its going to be 10000 to 9000. Maybe will see.
I'm looking to step in to usdt at around 9500 or to stage sells around there. To go from 9-8k means breaking back in to the downtrend?
It was a premature short imo. 9k is symbolic resistance only and the fact we didn't dump below 8.7 on the rejection was a huge red flag for opening a short. Still, you're a better trader than me and I'm probably spewing a whole lot of hindsight bias at you but I won't be shorting this until 9.2. 
Many of your active users have traded other cryptos for a couple of years.  
I sold some of my BTC stash above 16K and bought a new car.
Dentacoin with a half billion dollar market cap.
Yes, same exact conclusion here on every point!

Edit, and I'm only June and Sept now.  It took some practice to get ahold of their style volatility, burned me at first before I could take advantage of it, but fuck swaps. 
Nice! 

Nah closing them is cool here, *in hindsight*, as we've been iterating and you can keep reclaiming almost the same entry point. 

Yeah this wedge has denied all my long entries but one.  Have mostly added manually.  Position is way smaller than I want, but I think that's prudent considering that everything aside from psychology says we should dump.
They have a special deal to move funds so they can grab the premium between platforms. 
~~$60~~ $90 arbitrage now.
/u/_chewtoy_ 
Did you get stopped out on your short from last night? I really hope not, but I remember you saying you had stops set around 9010?
Pretty much:

If BTC doesn’t break 8600 on its attempts to push through the 9k resistance then there isn’t much to be bearish about 
Thank you for the explanation. 
As other have stated, being bearish does not mean we are against the tech. I am true believer in cryptocurrencies as a whole but this does not mean market trend has just one direction. After a such big run up i simply don't think we are already done with the bear market. Bears are not your enemy.

Edit: typo.
You can call lower highs higher lows, they are still lower highs, lower highs are a indicator you could see lower lows soon.
you should just post this link every time you post a bear/bull div analysis :-)
Didn’t mean to make you step out of your zone and post your position. 

Thank you. 
I don't think it was that type of comment actually, pretty sure /u/Coingurrruu is honestly asking /u/joyrider5's position.
Thanks.

Meant no harm. Just wanted an opinion from an elder BTC trader that is more well versed on the subject than I am 

Cheers 
Thanks you've been on the $
I agree. So much new money got burned they are scared to get back in. I’m positive we will see more parabolic moves but I’d be surprised if BTC takes part in the next round at least to the same degree. When pos is implemented on ETH things will get interesting very fast. 
Last one that triggered for me was four days ago on ltc and there was zero fee. 
I spend most of my time looking at everything but BTCUSD. These pumps in altcoins are from everyone but the average retail investor if you watch how the order-book flows in real time. Also when I refer to 'average retail investor' I'm not referring to people who are paying attention to altcoins, are subbed to /r/cryptocurrency and trade on binance. Average retail investor refers to the people buying bitcoin, ethereum, or litecoin on coinbase.
I did , otherwise i would have gone long by now.
If we stay in this rising wedge I don't think we'll go far below 8.7k. There's a chance we won't fall further before testing 9.1k though.

Somethings gotta give soon though, just not sure which way.

https://imgur.com/a/RzA1eyU
Not yet! 5x. Waiting for 8700 for now.
That definitely feels like the right play here, although stranger things have happened, but if it works out you'll have the perfect entry point. 
Good call
That's not what I said. :)
wtf? no one pumps verge and IOTA at best is a neutral coin with equals haters/shillers. BTC is praised and BCH is shat on, more for moral/ethical reasons and not necessarily technical. /r/cc actually has made some pretty damn good picks. VEN/ICX/NANO/REQ/XLM/PRL/GVT is a textbook /r/cc folio with BTC in varying degrees depending on risk tolerance. thats not even bad choices, at all. its a surprisingly reasonable community just sprinkled with bullshit just like any sub. even this one.
I think market cap is important, though. The run to 20k was set off by those elusive institutional investors, and they couldn't get on board until the market hit 100B (due to volatility and what not regulations).
He’s right. We are so early on in the tech. We can’t compare the above to others who have had decades to build out their infrastructure. I agree with your comments and they show me we have still so far to go. 
isn't it? if you think there is an untapped market (decent exchanges) then how is not starting an exchange a good idea.
Yeah but 3 successful iterations and one failed one would be pretty good. 

Too late to start now though that the range has narrowed and there aren't many iterations left. 
Good luck holding , i won't touch the current prices with a 10 feet pole.  remind me in 3 days.
This sub is loaded with bullish predictions based on zero technical or fundamental analysis , they are all clueless.

Technical or fundamental analysis are useless in a rigged market anyway.
no what the fuck not everything is a tinfoil conspiracy. wales have 7-8 figure portfolios, they're being cautious and trying to hedge their risk by selling as the market recovers. im sure many of them lost an immense amount of wealth since december and have been much more cautious lately.
I'm thinking we hit $9.2 before going below $8.5, if we do at all 
It is too much work to change my flair all the time. I am not a permabear. I am simply realistic. In a manipulated market when the price goes up due to manipulation I understand it is unsustainable. When the price gets oversold, then I will turn very bullish. But, for now, the price is very overbought and many people will get rekt.
The thing is: most people who aren't already in crypto don't know about downtrend lines and have no idea about anything relating to technical analysis. All they see is price going up and down.
C'mon Sloppy, I agree that sample size is small and I would hardly suggest that my personal experiences equal yours. 

But I have literally had more uninitiated chats in the last month than the entire fall of last year where my fantasy football name was Bitcoin or Bust. 

People have short memories and don't want to miss out on the next run after sitting on the sidelines last time. I am not saying they are, or are not, missing out on anything.
I also have had zero new people talking to me about crypto. These are people who previously bought, who then averaged down on the falling knife, and who are now just about break even and putting in their sell limits to eek out without losing anything.
Why?

And a futures contract is the way to go then
Why?
After seeing it smack its head against 9k multiple times today I'm not sure why anyone is buying right now. Wish it could just correct to 8.5 and get it over with!
Thanks for posting those 2 charts -- really makes things clear to the non TA among us (me).

On the first chart clearly it appears that we have broken through the bearish channel(is that what its called?) --- but if we were to fall down below around 8k can I assume that we would then obviously retest the 6700 range?

TIA!
Yeah, i know. Its like an asteroid caught in earth's gravity going down in flames. 
rest in peace in peace
You weren't asking me but I'll give you my opinion. I think the whole push down from around 8.5k a couple of weeks ago to 6.5k low was pure manipulation. Right now we are back where we should be and i think in the coming week we'll see another final dump down by whales or else a recovery back to over 10k. There are probably not many weak hands left at this level so I'd guess dumping and buying back lower is becoming less profitable. My advice would be to find a good entry point for a long, but set a tight stop, which is the strategy I am taking.

If you're comparing 1 ZEC with 1 XMR, you're comparing an apple with an orange.
Not really. Chose a few duds.. but also yes in some cases I let off some of my bitcoin profits from November into a few tokens and coins that have pretty much tanked.

I'm hardly worried but thanks for the RIP
Maybe not. It's an indicator of new money certainly, but existing money or old money won't be googling every paycheck.
I specifically queried the idea that "hodlers" would search for Bitcoin 'every single day'.
Like I said I wasn't speaking to all points. I'm saying your suggestion that google trends "would include many hodlers searching every single day" is probably flawed.

I don't see why hodlers would search google for "Bitcoin" terms?
There won’t be 165k Gox Btc available in September, will be tied up in court for several years.
excatly lol
At least for Europe, I can say for sure that this statement is \- at the very minimum \- exaggerated, if not outright wrong. If this is what saturation looks like then any long\-term holder like me would be wasting time here \(not saying that I am not spending too much time here LOL\). In my circle of friends, all of them well\-educated and pretty well off, very few have actually held crypto at some point or still do. Interestingly though, some of them are currently considering to get back in...
Yeah that was crazy, I was dumbfounded by the Dash ads on the plane. I can't imagine most people followed up with that though, considering I was confused regardless of being in the know. 

It's not as if the presence of those ads are any kind of prerequisite of going up though. They'll appear again when it's marketable/profitable to do so, which comes later in the hype train but not before it. 
> It is also less secure for the buyer

No, it's less secure for the seller (of BTC). The buyer's BTC is escrowed, little can go wrong with that. A bank transfer, on the other hand...
SBP doesn't make the laws. Parliament does. I live in Pakistan and know what I'm talking about. 

The only victim of the SBP's hostility is the one centralized exchange we had and it was run by incompetent people anyway so no big loss.
The Paki's don't seem to care about the ban: https://coin.dance/volume/localbitcoins/PKR/BTC
i see
Maybe. There has been a lot of speculation that it's all hype and/or wash trading by exchanges. There are enough bad signals to give many people here doubts about this run. Do you read everything here?

Edit: . . with a open mind? 
Why don't you debate the factual and logical merits of what he posted, rather than pretending this his motives are not pure.
[deleted]
Me posting here does not move the market. However, there is a LOT of misinformation about the market. I post to provide clarity about the other side of the narrative. A market needs both bulls and bears. In bitcoin, people are bullish to an extreme degree and try to ignore all alternate evidence.

If I can teach someone something they did not understand before, then I am doing a good job. A outlined some fundamentals in my main post here: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/dxs885e/

Most people don't really think how things work. For example, the relationship between ICOs and advertising incentives. If I can enlighten someone and that saves them some money or lets them trade better, then I am happy.
Actually, there are not huge amounts of people joining crypto subs. You can use reddit metrics to see it is still way below bull highs: http://redditmetrics.com/r/cryptocurrency 

There are more people online /r/bitcoinmarkets than normal, but that is because everyone is curious to see what happens. It does not reflect new money coming in. Other subs like cryptocurrency are still showing less people online than several months ago.
Manipulation is simply a product of unregulated markets (and will always be the case in unregulated markets). It’s still the Wild West/early days. Things will change for the better or worse in due time. I wouldn’t let that distract you from BTC’s potential and place in this world though. 
What does price manipulation have to do with the utility of the coin?

If it's gonna do what we hope it's gonna do it'll reach dimensions where price manipulation won't be ~~possible~~ reasonable anyway? who cares if we get a couple years of whale games (which are only relevant to traders anyway, not so much to the tech) until then. So if you're in it for the reason you say you're in it for, why should you care?

I mean, i understand your frustration but i feel like you're mixing two things together that don't really fit.

I mean sure, quit trading, there's rationale in that, but why turn your back on crypto?
Post this shit again when we're at 20K, I dare you! We're in it for the money, at least I am.

But, if you're being serious, I'll miss you man!
Hey man I love the fact that you are one of the few that is truly supportive of what cryptos were originally made for. However, in this shitty capitalism world we live in, any advancement in tech including crypto, will ultimately only lead to the benefit of the few.
I will most def be back. Right now, it's just not what I signed up for. Everything was fine before these massive candles. Before that we had pumps but not like this. 2 weeks of pure green with barts here and there. Fuck that.

There is no basis for any real use case anymore. Everyone just wants to get rich quick. BCH pumping even though it's garbage. All the shitcoins pumping even though we put that to rest a long time ago.

It's just bullshit FOMO. WE had a 1.5k candle... WHAT. THE. FUCK. We pumped from 8200 to 8500 and from 8500 to 9k in one 24 hour time-period.
Hah yeah, I've "quit" in 2013, 2014, and 2016.
We went from 9k to 6k in 2 weeks too lol

It went just as fast the other way.
I take it you weren't around for the last one? It was really unpredictable then, too. Tons of debate for the year+ leading up to it about what it would mean for the price. It was interesting to see it all unfold, and I'm sure it'll be just as interesting this next time.
The market can't break through because it's already overextended. Absurdly so on medium timeframes (although not overextended at all on higher timeframes like the 3d and 1w). 

Buyers don't want to miss the boat, so they're buying the dip like mad. 

They also don't want to risk holding the bag short term though, so they refuse to buy higher than $9,000. 

My guess is that fomo will win out here and the market will get even more ridiculously overextended until there's a short term implosion of 10% to 15% that gets bought up with reckless abandon once the bottom is found. 
because psychology of round numbers
The people I told last summer to buy at $3500 and said no are buying now. They think another run could come and are regretful that they missed the last boat. They are also diversifying into 4-5 coins, so they are contributing to alts as well. 

Yes, anecdotal and small sample, but just reporting in. 
Textbook consolidation. Probably some accumulation going on. 
FWIW, it is Sunday, and specifically Sunday morning in the US.  I think some of the key buyers really don't sit in front of these charts 24/7 and honestly weighting the weekend price action less in analysis about long term price direction would serve a lot of people well.
Well, each time we've been rejected, the drop has been less violent each time. That tells me that we will eventually break it and hold above the 9k range. Typically each time resistance is tested without full rejection, that resistance becomes less likely to reject the next time it's tested.
9K is the last major resistance we had. If we break 9k now it will show us that the crash pattern is no longer valid for bitcoin. 
A BitMEXican standoff :O
The original post did not say the HC COULD say that. Read the original post. It clearly says the High Court of Delhi issued a notice citing crypto ban violating the constitution, which is not true. The HC has not made any determination.

Anyone can start a lawsuit. The existence of a lawsuit without a decision is non-news.
The high court has not made any determination. It is a court case that anyone can file and there is a court process. Part of that court process is gathering information, which is all the high court has asked for. There has been no indication that anything is not constitutional or that the ban will not remain.
More with his spamming of bad news. MAkes it seem like he has an agenda.
Can someone ELI5 why Tether going down would crash the entire crypto market? Wouldn't that mean that people will take funds away from Tether and put it into Bitcoin, therefore increasing the price?


I'm 100% sure I'm overlooking something but I don't know what it is.
With all due respect, you don't seem to have much experience in this market.  I assure you, this rise is sustainable and probably hasn't even hit full speed yet.
Everyone knows there are no woman in the internet duh. What is the neutral form of guy? 
the market as a whole is bigger than any whale. If trend is up/down, no whale can stop it.
Your money. Good luck.
Here are a few ways: https://www.tradingview.com/x/0YWibFC4/

Edit: All which have broken down at this point.
The thing is, Ichimoku isn't only lagging. It's drawing the cloud in-front of the price.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
My long from 8280. My long from 6K is still open, but I'd stop that one under 8700.
Big green dildo
Well the manipulation and fraud is in clear sight, but only if you want to see or accept it.
I'm not underwater and shorted above 9K , many bulls are underwater on a long above 11K , they are at a huge loss and desperate to sell higher , i understand their bullish sentiment and anger at bears very well.
I agree about the bull trap but i won't see 11.7k happening , 5/6K is more likely 
I’m not sure what you mean. I’ll do my best to infer: you want to take a loan in USD (from some financial institution like a bank) using your stocks in a brokerage account as collateral? Then, you want to use that USD to buy bitcoin?

There is (almost) no tax implication involved in taking the initial loan of USD. The only thing you’d worry about is, as always, the difference between what you eventually sell the BTC for and what you bought it for, and the duration you held. This is your capital gain (or loss), and whether you get to treat that gain as long-term (lower tax) or have to treat it as short-term (regular income tax).

The reason I said there’s *almost* no tax implication for the loan is this: because the loan was taken as a direct step in an endeavor to make an investment, the costs involved with the loan (i.e. the loan interest) is tax deductible as an investment expense against any profit you make on the bitcoin. This effectively makes the loan interest cheaper by reducing the tax liability for gains you make holding bitcoin.

That said, I don’t foresee that any bank will really be keen to enable you to do this. Nor, necessarily, do I think you should attempt it in the event that you are empowered to do so. It’s not my place to judge, so that’s all you’ll hear about it from me. Also, I must reiterate, I'm not a CPA. If you have questions, ask a CPA instead of Reddit!
It depends on where you live, but most likely it would be taxable.
Looks like I left my webcam on again...
r/Bitcoin probably. 
i heard he bought the golden gate bridge with Cuckbucks

You are right the number of longs is not extreme based on historical standards but it is high based on recent history. However, the rally prior was not based on stop hunting shorts and then subsequent buying based on the momentum of shorts closing. It was based on a rally of an expanding market and we are not seeing an expanding crypto market right now. All indications indicate a market that is still contracting.

As a result, this rally is likely a "paper rally", a "bull trap" or a "dead cat bounce". In such a case, just like the rally started by stomping out shorts it will likely end by stomping out the longs.
You could make a religion out of this.
You are the very definition of dumb money. In that sense, welcome, friend! 
[removed]
!remindme 6 months
Probably the biggest bull run since the last bull run you mean?
The mods upgraded my firmware. I love Ethereum now.
[removed]
If BCH was that good Ver wouldn't need to keep calling it Bitcoin or ride on the back of it.
Back in the 80s, there was a popular work out video called 7 minute abs.  Eventually, competitors called 6 minute abs, 5 minute abs, etc, all tried to take market share.  They were far less successful because everyone realized they were just cheap ripoffs.

BCH is a cheap ripoff of bitcoin.  It would be far less successful if it didn't steal the name.  This is why BCH forked instead of starting a whole new coin.  And even if your argument held any validity, and lightning doesn't turn out to be the superior scaling solution that it is on paper, btc always has the option to increase block size.  What BCH did isn't novel in any way.
Bitcoin still has the brand name and pairing variety. If technology was that important to investors, then LTC would be worth 1/4 of btc. 
Why would you short now?

Surely when it dropped below 9k again was the time to short? This looks like a higher low here right now. Surely you’d wait to either see how 9k is tested again, or, wait until 8600 is broken downwards to create a lower low?
Add to your long man, be a part of the movement! YOU can help break 9100! 
Any trader would have sold well before then.  If you had managed to hold all the way up to a .5 ratio, you are a moron for not unloading.  That is of course unless you are a holder and believe bitcoin cash is the real bitcoin.
I'm long BCH from 0.092 and took profit on a quarter of it earlier. It's still pumping. Wouldn't be surprised if it keeps going. Just transferred the other 3/4 to cold storage for a long term hodl. 
> none of them are devs. Kind of like a Red Herring

Untrue. Craig is absolutely a developer. He developed the world’s first online casino, in Java Beans. Before that, back in 1986 he displayed Herculean efforts as Sr. Software Engineer; in charge of a five person team, throughout the infamously grueling development of *Barnyard Blaster* for the Atari 7800. He’s a systems engineer, blockchain dev, UIX designer, a paralegal, a certified cyber security and digital forensics specialist. And he files his own patents. The man is absolutely a polymath. He has 2 high school diplomas, 21 undergraduate degrees, 93 postgraduate degrees, 137 professional certifications, sworn peace officer badges in two towns in New South Wales, along with 6 black belts in a variety of martial arts. He has a signed autograph from George Costanza and is a certified Tae Bo Master Instructor, having studied directly under Billy Blanks himself. The number of degrees he *hasn’t* completed is one. But made up for it recently when Paris University awarded him an honorary masters degree in mathematics for his work *Reading About Statistical Distributions On Wikipedia* (as part of that head-poundingly stupid unresolved bet on selfish mining with Peter Rizun). Craig also makes his own shoes and drives himself places while allowing his driver to sit in the back. He’s currently pursuing a doctorate of Law Sui juris at the University of Leicester and another one in *Hard Maths* thru the Massachusetts Institute of Columbia’s correspondence course and online diploma program. 

He has an Erdős–number of 2. 

Of course Craig is a developer. 
I was listening to a podcast interviewing Craig. I really don't like him, and it's not even because of his claims to be Satoshi. He is very rude and diverts from the original question to avoid answering them. Anyway, to be fair, do you really need that many devs to increase the block size, or is BCH more than that? 
But they hardly have any devs and the roadmap is pretty much status quo is a-ok. Isn't that the whole point? Bitcoin was perfect the way it was, so let's just blow up the blocks until running a node is infeasible?

Such innovation!
ah gotcha. it seems to be going straight up. impressive really
I don't think this line matters, but the chart is quite scary... A drop to 520$ wouldn't be surprising
oops, missed a factor of 10. 

and that is just bitcoin, imagine ether and the other shitcoins
I trade crypto as a hobby using personal funds, in my newly acquired free time. Completely unrelated to my profession. 
Keeps me accountable to post here.
 If I wouldn't post the trade, maybe I should rethink it
you don't know what you are talking about do you?
My sentiment at the time was that the market might not make it $9,200 before a significant pullback. 

Which honestly might still very well the the case.
Yes, I realize that. When there has been a lot of discussion in the past we've just done alt megathreads. Now we're ready to allow more thorough discussion.
What did you get?
That's awesome, congrats! I'd really like to pay off my house with it. It has to go back above 15K though. I can wait a year or two. 
I just look at the one that has lowest price and places orders there. i am also thinking of some ratio tool. So if swaps are 10, June 9.5 and September 9.2, it would be better to long september , but if June are higher and you want to go short then short tem.

Then in my example the ratio is 5-7%, but it can be interesting to see if this extends down or up and do trades on that
Managed to catch a long at that dump. 

Riding this guy out 
not clear  , please elaborate  a little


are other exchanges doing similar things  as well??
Afaik that is illegal in most countries. A broker is required to transmit your orders immediately to an exchange and is not permitted to hold your orders or schedule them in such a way to capture premium.

They can, of course, simply charge higher fees.
Nope, still holding. 

Stamp never made it above $9,010 after I entered my short, so my alarms never went off. 
Yup
I agree, not sure why people downvoted me. It's another bullish sign so don't count on a countertrend just yet :) My comment was mostly to folks like Paul Krugman idiots who short with the vision of Bitcoin falling to near zero. They deserve to be punished.
Could easily turn this around by saying higher lows are an indicator we could see higher highs soon, which is more plausible than your take considering the recent change in sentiment. 
No problem.  4 hour bear div played out successfully we now have 6 hour bear div on the rsi confirmed.

It ended up playing out like I said, low volume green candle on the 2 hour followed by large red candle on the 2 hour :)  Looking at the volume on this new 4 hour candle, the downside may be over here.  So arguably the short should be closed now (at minute of new daily).  But the TA gave us the edge we need for a good short entry and now that we have the edge we can hold the winning position and see what luck gives us. 
Whoops - just read it the wrong way.
Yes, thanks.

I know he’s knowledgeable and never hurts to ask. 

Will only make me a better trader 
My apologies for my unwarranted response to your post, I misinterpreted it. That in mind, definitely add him or her to your list of posters to follow. Typically very good call outs.
No prob and thanks
I wonder if it's because they needed to split my order into several pieces to fill it.  My limit was like a few dollars less than the stop, and the price change was fast.
> BTC is praised and BCH is shat on, more for moral/ethical reasons 

i.e. bullshit pulled-out-of-my-ass reasons.

bitconnect used to be quite popular there too.
[deleted]
thats not how remind me works pal, try again.
I never claimed it was a "tinfoil conspiracy". I was asking a question to people who I think are more knowledgeable on the subject than I am.


Take a chill pill.
[deleted]
Too much work:) 

It's cool, just giving you some grief. I appreciate the bearishness when the comments are well thought out and articulated. Some of yours are, some come off as a Bitcoin Rekt Jehovah's witness. 

A big bad bear comment saved me a absolute ton of money this winter, so any and all constructive conversation is appreciated. Was just kinda stating the obvious that right now, you are a bit, bearish.
True, the market sentiment seems a lot higher than February though.
I mean I'm sure it happens...I just see these comments upvoted really high and I don't think it's in a "me too" way but more in a "that's good news" way. 


Need btc to trade. How would a futures contract work here? What do I post as collateral?
Money laundering of some sort or hiding assets.  Doesn't want exposure to Bitcoin's price but wants assets stored in crypto.
Already bouncing, seems 8750 was the lowest it got this time... 
[deleted]
lol yes its an oldie http://knowyourmeme.com/memes/rip-in-peace
Appreciate the post but i respectively disagree. This whole movement upwards just feels like all the other bounces we've had. Low volume, random market buys to pump the price.

Basically I wouldnt be surprised at all if we dumped further, and i would be pretty surprised if we had already hit the bottom. But then again bitcoin has a history of being unpredictable.

No point in arguing about it though since neither of us really knows what will happen, but goodluck :)
To check price, to search for news, to see what bitcoin wallet updates exist, to look for reasons why the price is rising / falling, hell I type "reddit bitcoin" into google to find the bitcoin reddit page.
How many have heard of crypto? My guess is almost everyone. The market is saturated when everyone who would be interested in something has been exposed to it and has had the ability to take part in it. The fact that 95% are not interested does not change the fact it is saturated.
that's racist
His posts have valid reasoning but he's been posting it so much, what for though?
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I'm talking from a point of momentum. If you think of price as a lagging indicator regarding cryptocurrency interest, you will see that as momentum ramps up, so will the price. Once we start up-trending again, that will lead to the network effect and we will be back on the news every day. Just my 2 sats.  
I code, I don’t need to hold Crypto. I’m not turning my back on Cryptography, I’m turning my back on Cryptocurrency
I agree, although I'm not sure what timeframe you are refering to with 'everything was fine before..', because the (late) 2017 mania was not less ridicilous.
To be honest lately I'm not entirely convinced that BTC is a whole lot better than the alts either. Its real world use seems to be diminishing and honestly the more I try to think about it rationally the more I start to question its legitimate use for the vast majority of people. It is very much being used entirely as a store of value. 
Kind of ironic from someone that fell ass backwards into money gambling in the market last year. There was bound to be a a few of you. But truthfully this i quit post reaffirms for me that TA is a fools errand in the long run. 
And look what happened when we hit 6k.
it actually looked more organic on the way down than on the way up though
Excatly I was around as I had already sold. Was lurking on reddit tho for years. As you said its going to be mega mega interesting indeed. There are some really wild predictions even now.
Bitcoin is traded in KRW, JPY, EUR, and many other currencies. There is no "round numbers"
I’ll be on the sidelines eating tacos 
>  Do you think this could result in a reversing the government crackdown trend we're having since last year?

You really need to learn readong so you do not look like a moron.

The original post CLEARLY ASKS:

> Do you think this could result in a reversing the government 
> crackdown trend we're having since last year?

Now, I grant, it is extremely unlikely. But hey, winning hte lotteriy is extremely unlikely and a lot of lottery winners tell you it is possible.

Now, China and South Korea are a second question. China is VERY unlikely - becaus there, the communist party writes the rules. South Korea MAY happen - it is a democracy and voters have some say. But then, the whole ICO thing is much more a "follow the regular procedure for issuing stock, beacuse, hey, doing an ICO does not invalidate that law" kind of thing to start with.

Thanks for demonstrating the failure to educate people in basic logic.
Of course you consider any genuine bad news to be "spam".  That says quite a lot about you.  Sorry, but the truth got out this time and even has quite a few upvotes.  You failed to suppress it.
You're technically correct. There was a run on USDT last April. The price of USDT dropped to ~$0.9 and people were fleeing to BTC and alts. Coincidentally or not, this was right before BTC finally broke through its previous ATH and went on the historic 20x run of 2017. At least in that one instance, an issued with USDT apparently did not hurt BTC (or alts).

I think the reason people around here believe the fall of Tether would crash the market is because of the *psychological* effect it would have. There's a lot of deep beliefs that Tether has been propping up the price of BTC. So if Tether was proven insolvent, it would indicate there was less demand than previously believed. This is reasonable, except I don't see how it applies to the case where Tether is shut down for other reasons (i.e. regulatory). 
Been in the market since 2013 man. I'm just not convinced but this rally is definitely impressive. Wish I'd seen it coming.
Person?
It'll be time to draw a yet another way if this bounces.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Ah nice.  I'm a little offset from you. Had a fresh long from 7800 that ran out of stream around 9k, and have a new one from 8.8 that I'm not gonna put a SL on. 

Also had a short that was built from 8.5 to 9k that stopped in minor loss.  This 8.8~9.2k is behaving how I expected 8.5~9.0 to play out when I had built that up.  Wasn't around yesterday and most of today to try again to play that 2 position game up here in this interval, but looks like a lot of good iterations happened here like the inverse of 6k a couple weeks back. 
No, it's not manipulation. It's manipulation™
Like there wasn’t manipulation down this last few months.
Yeah, that'd be my guess too.  Apparently Ver and Wu drink the blood of freshly slaughtered infants too.
i heard he paid $100m to buy reddit subs
When you say "All indications" what are you talking about?  And why do you dismiss the obvious indications that the market is expanding like 61% increased volume on the CME Bitcoin Futures last month over Feb. increased interest from Wall Street trading desks in the space, signups on exchanges, etc.?  You don't think that's really happening, or maybe you are talking about something else? I'm honestly trying to understand what you are saying.
oh the irony lol
[removed]
6 months - near the time of the Mt Gox court hearing. Might be onto something here.
I will be messaging you on [**2018-10-22 11:11:21 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2018-10-22 11:11:21 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  6 months) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! dxrvrko)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
[removed]
He doesn't *need* to call it bitcoin anymore than  I *need* to call a golden retriever and poodle dogs. BCH is bitcoin. More precisely it is one side of the Aug 1st ledger fork.
> Back in the 80s, there was a popular work out video called 7 minute abs. Eventually, competitors called 6 minute abs, 5 minute abs, etc, all tried to take market share. They were far less successful because everyone realized they were just cheap ripoffs.

It's a funny analogy (and one I used myself years ago when talking about Litecoin and its 2.5 min block times), but it doesn't really work here.  An arbitrary constraint on transactional capacity is a direct attack on Bitcoin's money property and basic value proposition, and one that increases in severity as time passes.

https://www.reddit.com/r/btc/comments/6emrtd/three_ways_an_arbitrary_capacity_limit_harms/

>BCH is a cheap ripoff of bitcoin. 

BCH is a minority fork of Bitcoin / candidate attempting to become the most-worked, economically-dominant "Bitcoin" chain.

>It would be far less successful if it didn't steal the name.

It would be bizarre if it didn't use the name Bitcoin. 

>This is why BCH forked instead of starting a whole new coin. 

Yikes no. Just because the protocol of the majority chain was being badly mismanaged, that doesn't mean you need to wipe the ledger clean and launch yet another altcoin. Great article by Daniel Krawisz on how to think about forks here: [How to Face Bitcoin Forks](https://docs.google.com/document/d/1GY1A9R13_iNJn4Fai43C6qXnHgqNNWn-09Eqq3Ps0f0/edit).

>And even if your argument held any validity, and lightning doesn't turn out to be the superior scaling solution that it is on paper, 

[Lightning isn't a scaling solution at all.](https://www.reddit.com/r/btc/comments/8b9wd0/people_here_say_lightning_network_is_vaporware/dx5gb6r/)

>btc always has the option to increase block size.

Well *maybe*. But you've identified the key question -- whether BTC can and will correct course before it squanders the last of its network effect advantage.  If you'd asked me a year or two ago, I would have said of course. For a long time, I was extremely skeptical of what I called the ["fork now, gain market share later" path](https://bitco.in/forum/threads/gold-collapsing-bitcoin-up.16/page-417#post-14337).  I'm still somewhat skeptical but not nearly as much. Keep in mind that there are now lots of stakeholders (including some who control significant hash rate) who now have a strong interest in preventing BTC from correcting course.  

>What BCH did isn't novel in any way.

Well no, it's just following what was always the original plan re: scaling.  But this isn't a contest where "novelty" for its own sake gets you much.
I find the BTC obsession with bitcoins “brand”, as if any entity could legitimately claim ownership of it, to be rather interesting.

The fear engineered by BTC control over community hubs translated into retention of the exchange tickers and infrastructure meaning BCH had to essentially start from scratch. 

This it has done, astoundingly well. 

As BCH gains rapidly against BTC the market is realising the dwindling significance of those exchange tickers.

This is the source of the BTC obsession with “branding” and the source of their fear. When honestly and objectively compared with the original bitcoin design, BCH, they have nothing but those tickers.

Incumbency, not merit.

Traders should position themselves appropriately, the market irrationality is ending.
Additionally, BCH exists because some people didn't want to use market forces to push industry into creating scaling solutions. Now that those market based solutions are in place in alpha and beta phases BCH fanatics are running around trying to prove they don't work because they still have bugs in their unreleased projects.
Im talkong ablut shorting BCH
Only if I wasn't all in. But yeah I wish I could help and contribute towards the price if I had the chance to. 
BCH is about the original vision of Bitcoin. Memo is Twitter on the blockchain. Cointext lets you send BCH to any phone that can text, with no internet access. That's just stuff from this month. After the fork, OP codes will allow a lot more projects that depend on a strong scalable currency with low fees.
BCH is forking to 32MB and increasing OP codes. Have you seen memo? Its Twitter on the blockchain. What are you on about with no devs, bro?
I do (at least I think I do), his stops are at 5% so if his leverage is higher than 20x, his position gets liquidated before the stops are even hit. Therefore his leverage is probably 20x max and therefore his loss would be at minimum 1/20th of $100k equals $5k.

edit: never mind, I'm retarded. I think.
Yes it's a nice development and should be helpful to a lot of people.
I sold my BTC for EUR, or do you mean the car its a kia ceed sportswagon.
As far as we know, no. As far as we can suspect, probably yes. They have no latency in their servers at all and that is enough to make it more profitable. 
If you are doing a stop sell the limit needs to be above the stop for it to have zero fee. Opposite for stop buy. That is probably your issue assuming I interpreted what you said incorrectly. 
I’m with you. I don’t keep any funds on exchanges for the reasons you outlined. But I also don’t compare these exchanges to offerings from traditional markets and also understand that we are *still* very early on, even on peoples understanding of what bitcoin is. 
what insider info would a whale even know about crypto? theres no fundamentals, everyone chucking money at things that have no real utility and adoption.
I just try to go with the market :p 

Maybe the bulls will like me again for a bit 😂
Yeah that's for sure. I'm actually more bullish now than I was in February. I'm still being cautiously optimistic though. This small rally has seemed kinda artificial, I'm worried of it being a dead cat bounce. But buyers seem very strong.
That's fair, bullish bias is a thing for upvotes here. 

For me, the people that are asking are the right kinds of people. White collar, upper income, interested in diversification with limited amount of the portfolio, what you are supposed to do and not max out your credit card shit.

Also, one guy who is a Chief Compliance Officer at a bank that admits that his personal arena is ripe for disruption, but of course questions whether the constituents will allow it to happen (regulation lobby). In the end, he's placed a small bet that it could happen since the downside is $X and the upside is $X * much larger number. 
Lol. no. I want btc to trade, but don't want to assume the risk of the asset price going up and down. 
Great -- thanks for the addition info and the advice.   I have about 20% in fiat and tether right now and am fighting the FOMO.  Have been trying to take it further and sell more now but as you said, it is tough fighting those herd animal instincts.
Thanks again for the link detailing the A&E --- great info there and so far this seems text book.

If you dont mind -- 1 more question?!
As per the measure rule it looks as though a breach of breakout price will bring us quickly to around 17-18k which also coincides with the second highest top on the chart --- at that point should we expect decline, consolidation, or more increase?

Many thanks  ;)
Really? I type "red" into the address bar and Chrome autofills the rest because I come here all the time. That autofill thing is so effective for my most visited sites, I don't even use bookmarks.
Probably has a huge underwater short based on his reasoning and now he is trying to push it.
Maybe. However, compared to a year ago, the potential market size decreased by 3 billion people. And, the incentive to advertise crypto is disappearing with the advertising bans and ICO crack downs.

That advertising is what was generating the interest that made it profitable for the nightly news to talk about bitcoin. In addition, as you already pointed out, bitcoin was talked about on the nightly news every day prior. If people didn't FOMO in during that time, it is unlikely they will FOMO in now (they are highly resistant to FOMO) especially considering reduced market potential crypto has now.
But one market is leading, why do you think price drops at 9k and not 8834 then ?
[deleted]
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I see. Thank you for the response. I sure hope that nothing happens to Tether then. 
It's not over.
Guy. 

The feminine form is gal but it carries pejorative connotations in many situations.
I had half my position from 8280 close at 8900 (trailing stop). I've been scaling into a short which is now just over the remaining long in size, CA 8930. I'm hoping for another dip into the 8600s to scale my long back in, but my first add is back at 8860. Not sure if I'm playing this week. I'm leaning closing out and waiting for a 5-10% drop, then 2x the whole thing.
I don't care how they call it , manipulation and fraud are bad.
Like I said before, this is the new meme. It's gonna replace "this is good for bitcoin" 
I posted them here: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/dxs885e/

Read each on as each one is a pretty damning indicator.
huh
They obsess over the brand because it is one of the few facets of bitcoin's network effect that is not being eroded by protocol mismanagement. That, and some of them honestly don't understand the implications of a ledger fork and erroneous ly believe that there can only be one bitcoin.
If I forked BCH now with 100mb blocks, would you dump all your BCH for my new coin?  If no, I'd be curious to hear your explanation why.  Would you call it a reckless fork?  Unneeded?  Would you call for majority concensus before forking?  
We’re talking about a financial system here. Why would you elect to go with the complex, nonexistent, unproven scaling approach over the proven, simple approach for a system that deals with monetary value.

At the very least, one would’ve made a compromise to implement the proven solution in the meantime so that said monetary system continues to function as usual, unaffected. While developing the complex official implementation on the backend such that it does not pose a risk for users of said monetary system to potentially lose their funds due to a number of reasons (bugs).

I encourage you to be honest with yourself, BCH adoption is spreading rapidly for a reason, when comparing BTC to BCH from a currency standpoint alone, it is more economical to use BCH. The only edge BTC has over BCH currently is more alt markets, thus making BTC the #1 choice as an altcoin gateway. To top it off, since BCH and BTC derive from the same protocol, any alt-pairing BTC has can be easily made to BCH. 
Gotcha.
Increase that leverage and buy in more!
So like the block chain equivalent of sending your friend human shit? 
Yawn. Who gives af? We're trying to solve sound digital money, not bloat the blockchain and announce a bunch of gimmicks. 
ahh gotcha.  Since I'm putting my limit below the stop, I'm saying @ 8900 (stop) execute a market order, but do not sell below 8895.

If I put a stop at 8900, and a limit at 8905, when the price hits 8900, place a limit sell at 8905.  Limit orders have no fee, but I have to wait until the price comes back up to 8905 in order to attempt to fill it.


Are you saying you want BTC to trade alts?  I think people want to help but it is confusing when you say you want to trade without exposure to price fluctuation.  That basically is what trading is.  Tell us exactly what you are trying to do and I will help if I can.
This is extremely simple. I'm not sure why people are getting confused. If you buy $8950 worth of btc, transfer it to bitmex immediately and then short 8950 contracts on futures.

You're still subject to price changes vs spot on futures, which is anywhere from a 1-5% gain to a 1-5% loss, depending on if futures go lower or higher, respectively. 

Shorting 1x is hedging. If you're always hedged, you're not exposed to risk from price swings, except for the swings between spot and futures.

if you short when futures are in backwardation and they go to a premium, you lose that amount. say you short the bottom and eventually close your short when they're in contango: e.g. you short when futures are 5% discount and close at 5% premium, then you've lost 10% of your entire stack on bitmex. 

The opposite can happen where you gain more if you enter on a premium and exit on a discount. 

This is unlikely to be anywhere near 10% unless you enter and exit on wicks due to low liquidity. 

Other than that exposure, your hedge preserves the value of your fiat and allows you to trade with the btc you have in your current hedge.

If you buy 1 btc, short 1x at $6k and it goes to $12k, you'll have 0.5 btc but you'll still have $6000 (probably 3-4% less due to futures premium by then) to trade wirh. 


Paper trading on bitmex.
[deleted]
[deleted]
ding ding, everyone that has bullish or bearish strong sentiment is betting on either or with their money. its all a con to get people to sell/buy in order to increase their chances of success. market psychology is cute.
If it was edited, you'd see a * at the end of the time of the comment, like most of your posts are. You, apparently, don't know how reddit works. 
Acutally you are a moron - already demonstrated and prooven - and the original post was not edited because.... oh, reddit says so. Ouch. Missing edited indicator. Ouch. You dont even know this website.
Eh, I just didn't see much upside after we broke $9k. RSI is also very hot. If we're still Bearish, which I think so, we got hidden bear divergence on the daily.

I'll long the next breakout but this still feels like another counter-trend rally for now.
Cool, good luck!

Yeah I was late for this long, only one limit filled, the rest of it has been from randomly checking on the price and deciding to add to it. Fomo is back.   It's got a bid ladder down to about 8300 which I think I will keep.
Then go play in another market. You are obviously contributing nothing here. 
I would not start from scratch with your new coin devoid of adoption or infrastructure because it offers no utility over BCH that would see it gain the adoption and infrastructure.

That’s my point, BCH has started from scratch and been astoundingly successful and now directly threatens the continued existence of the BTC chain precisely because the Blockstream/Core redesign has been so disastrous in terms of utility.


Yes, I'd call it unneeded. 

Yet, if there was only BTC and you do that, I'd call it the real Bitcoin.
Such a negative attitude. Surely you see the real future of crypto. Invest accordingly.
Making it accessible to the billions of poor is Bitcoin.  The rich already have plenty of ways to transfer wealth. Also funny how Bitcoin is for rich people, who can't afford a $100 hard drive every 5 years. But you'll figure that out. Keep trying to replace Gold on 1MB. 
It's simple. People post gold as collateral to borrow money. They pay back the principal amount plus interest and get their gold back. I want btc and I am ready to post money as collateral. I would give back the original amount of btc that I take, plus any interest on this to my lender. Is this possible?
And for me to be hedge and also be able to use this BTC, I would short with leverage right? If I short 3x then I would have to keep roughly 1/3 on bitmex and be able to withdraw the other 2/3? And just need to be sure that I don't reach liquidation (which would be roughly 3x the current price?)
I sold a bunch at 7k expecting another drop to below 6k --- it kept trying to break around 7-7.2k and kept getting denied so I figured ok, it's definately going to retest the bottom.....  and then that BGD appeared....

Not complaining though -- much rather it go up than down as I do not enjoy shorting.
Cool -- thanks again for all the info!
OK, so short it. We're up like 40 percent or whatever in two weeks, but you go ahead with your bearish outlook.  It won't make you any money, I'm afraid.
>I would not start from scratch with your new coin devoid of adoption or infrastructure because it offers no utility over BCH

And this is exactly why I don't support BCH.  BCH lacks the same level of adoption as BTC and offers no real increased utility of BTC.  

No matter what Bitcoin (or, the highest market cap coin if you want) does, there will come a competitor that one ups them.  Do they have 1 MB block size limits?  Someone will offer 2 mb limits.  Do they have blocks that confirm every 10 minutes?  Someone will do it in 9.  Does their difficulty algorithm adjust every 2016 blocks?  Someone will make a new algorithm that does it every 2000 blocks.  

It's the same as the 7 minute abs video.  Someone came along claiming they could do it in 6.  There is absolutely no end to this cycle.  Unless Bitcoin hits an absolute dead end in terms of usability, there is no reason for any other coin to surpass it in total circulating value.  And, since it is working just fine at the moment, and Segit has provided a solid 30% block size increase, I see absolutely no reason to change systems.  


Wait wut? Not following your logic here. If anything, protecting decentralization is the most important factor in keeping the protocol accessible. How does centralizing mining and development benefit the poor? What your describing is just more of the same. Bitcoin value (really all legitimate crypto projects) is entirely based on principles of decentralization. Lose that and you lose everything. 

Also, Bitcoin will likely raise the block size at some point when it becomes necessary and feasible to do so by consensus. LN at full global adoption would require a block size of at least 100 mb, as has been discussed extensively by developers. 

So your 1MB quip is a total strawman. 

Good luck with digital gold on a centralized project that nobody with cred takes seriously and most mock wholeheartedly!
It is possible, but it makes a difference and would really help to understand what you are wanting to do with the BTC.  I mean, are you happy leaving it on an the exchange where you are effectively hedging it?  It sounds like you would buy BTC then deposit it somewhere and hedge it through a short 1 to 1.  That's easy enough to do, but I can't imagine it accomplishes what you want because it doesn't accomplish anything at all.
Yes you can do that as well to reduce counter party risk. 

Most people short 10x to hedge and leave 1/10 on bitmex. Personally I think it's a lil too small since btc frequently moves 10% but idk. 
> BCH lacks the same level of adoption as BTC and offers no real increased utility of BTC. 

An 8-fold increase in tx/s and a 32-fold increase in May. How is that not increased utility?
You're coming at me with talking points. I want a discussion. How is BTC not centralized when the same miners mine BCH? Is BTC changing proof of work if decentralization is that much a deal? Monero did it just fine. I take their word about being against centralization, but with BTC, it seems like a hollow argument. Especially since lightning nodes have to be on to work, centralized corporations seem like the best ones to support lightning, not Joe blow on his home PC. 
I agree, this does seem possible.
I want to move the borrowed BTC to another exchange (Binance) and then trade there with it. 
There are 1100 unconfirmed bitcoin transactions as I type.  8 mb blocks would add no speed at the current backlog.

If I forked BCH to go from 8 mb blocks to 64 mb blocks, would you tell me the capacity increase isn't needed, or would you dump all your BCH for the new higher capacity fork?
You're discrediting my discussion points by labeling them "talking points." Does a discussion not stem from talking point??

I'm not sure you really understand what is meant by centralization in this debate. I'm talking about a multitude of centralizing factors: mining vulnerability, increased node cost and **non-consensus-based hard forks, which only weaken Bitcoin's network and create a second network, which itself is weaker than Bitcoin (double stupid)**. You seem to only be referencing ASICs or something (which, btw, I'm not against).

The whole point of Bitcoin is that it's decentralized, meaning that majority-rule is not possible. All of Bitcoin's use cases are derivative of this. If you want a "cheap way to send money," XRP is loads better than BCH. BTC is trying to fulfill the entire sound money use case, not just means of exchange. It's paramount that Bitcoin remain decentralized and consensus-base, otherwise immutability, store of value, unit of account, fungibility, etc. etc. all get thrown out the window and you end up with a totally worthless shitcoin that you mind as well just call BCash. 

Think what you will but there's a reason why no serious developer thinks BCH is a worthwhile endeavor and its only figureheads are a basket of deplorable scammers and con-artists. 
You would buy spot BTC with your $$s.  Many ways to do this, but if you need help, just ask.

You then hedge your BTC with a short futures contract or short spot contract at an exchange where you can do that.  You are going to need to have at least some of the BTC as collateral to do this and you will need to watch the position because if price moves up hard you would need to add collateral.

Take some of the BTC not used to collateralize the hedge and transfer to Binance.

My 2 cents is that you would be better off having the long exposure to BTC while you trade the alts.  You may be able to hedge into tether from time to time when you don't want to be long crypto.  What you are wanting to manage is possible, but it's not super simple and wouldn't be hard to screw up if you don't stay on top of the margin requirements.  It would be pretty easy to imagine you liquidating your hedge and then price reversing hurting your remaining spot position if you use too much leverage on the hedge.

Others may have a better plan for you.  Thanks for explaining what you are trying to do.
> There are 1100 unconfirmed bitcoin transactions as I type. 8 mb blocks would add no speed at the current backlog.

... Yes they would. What?

BCH will remove the limit entirely soon enough. The limit is a centrally planned production quota. The sooner you understand that the sooner you can understand Bitcoin.
>Think what you will but there's a reason why no serious developer thinks BCH is a worthwhile endeavor and its only figureheads are a basket of deplorable scammers and con-artists. 

Is this a no true Scotsman type thing? Plenty of "serious developers" take BCH seriously. Every dev working on BCH or building things on top of it takes it seriously. I'm a dev and I take it seriously. The other developers I've talked to at my workplace take it seriously. But then again most of us find it completely unacceptable that BTC allowed its network to become congested and unusable for months and then celebrated the worst of that congestion as a victory.
Hey thanks for explaining this, I may appear like a newbie, but I'm not :) I do own BTC in general but do not want to add to this position. Hence the question. 

But I guess the hassle would be quite big because collateral on Bitmex would be BTC, so I wouldn't be able to use it all and also have to be sure to have enough margin at all times. 

Thanks for being patient. 

>BTC allowed its network to become congested and unusable for months and then celebrated the worst of that congestion as a victory.

Allowed? Mining and market consensus chose BTC. Nobody "allowed" this to happen, this is what the miners chose. If BCH were the answers then the miners would have switched over and we would be calling BCH Bitcoin... but we aren't and the miners stuck with BTC. 

Consensus. Consensus. Consensus. There is nobody in charge of BTC that's crippling it or whatever. It's a consensus-based protocol. The contentious forks are alts because they break the consensus and Bitcoin *is* the consensus network. Consensus, consensus, consensus. Economic incentives and consensus, that's all it boils down to. 

No offense, I don't know what you do for development, but I'm referring to the developers that have devoted their lives to this work and have been in the space for many years. 

It's also just readily evident to anyone that looks at the problem that scaling on chain is simply not a solution. 

Sorry but I just don't see how BCash is anything but a cheap way for Ver and co. to increase their fiat/BTC holdings. No reason to implement an unmanageable mega-database as a blockchain, just use a regular database and have Jihan host the servers. That's all it will become anyhow (if it becomes anything at all).
No problem.  I think what you really might want to look into is using tether to trade the alts.  There are lots of places to do that and you wouldn't have any exposure to BTC price fluctuations.  You would have risk associated with tether itself, but that is very similar to the counterparty risk you have trading anywhere.  The alts themselves have a lot of exposure to BTC price fluctuations though.
> Allowed? Mining and market consensus chose BTC. Nobody "allowed" this to happen, this is what the miners chose. If BCH were the answers then the miners would have switched over and we would be calling BCH Bitcoin... but we aren't and the miners stuck with BTC.

And make less money? Do you imagine miners are doing something other than running a business? I prefer BCH to BTC, but if I were a miner I'd mine whatever chain was most profitable at any given time.

As for the market, how informed do you imagine the average investor was FOMOing into the bull-run last year? The market chose BTC not on the basis of merit, but because it kept the BTC ticker, and because given two approaches to solving a problem, non-technical speculators will always prefer the more complicated solution that promises more (LN + Segwit) to the simpler solution (increasing the blocksize). 

>Consensus. Consensus. Consensus. There is nobody in charge of BTC that's crippling it or whatever. It's a consensus-based protocol. The contentious forks are alts because they break the consensus and Bitcoin is the consensus network. Consensus, consensus, consensus. Economic incentives and consensus, that's all it boils down to.

I don't think "consensus" means a lot when the Core devs can achieve said consensus by driving out everyone who disagrees with the 1MB4EVA ethos and when the main discussion forums are run by Theymos whose position is that if 90% of people disagree with his policy that talking about onchain-scaling is "altcoin discussion" than 90% of people need to leave.  

>No offense, I don't know what you do for development, but I'm referring to the developers that have devoted their lives to this work and have been in the space for many years.

Even under this definition, there are plenty of blockchain devs who support on-chain scaling. Gavin Andresen, Mike Hearn, Jeff Garzik, and Vitalik Buterin to name *just a few*. The only way you can dismiss these guys as "serious developers" is to commit the no True Scotsman fallacy. This is not a good approach to making your argument that "BCash" sucks.

>It's also just readily evident to anyone that looks at the problem that scaling on chain is simply not a solution.

It was how Bitcoin worked up until now. When the network saw more usage the blocks got bigger to accommodate it. Why is 1MB so special that miners shouldn't be allowed to create blocks in excess of it? What so terrible would have happened if Bitcoin had received even a modest blocksize increase before the fee events of last year? 

I can only think of positives. People wouldn't have been turned off Bitcoin by seeing that the future of money is so expensive to transact with. Businesses wouldn't have stopped accepting Bitcoin. The altcoin boom would not have been as pronounced, etc.

>Sorry but I just don't see how BCash is anything but a cheap way for Ver and co. to increase their fiat/BTC holdings. 

You're welcome to think that, but that's not a very good argument because there's no evidence for it. If you understand the history of Bitcoin you'll know there's been a large portion of the Bitcoin community that has been demanding a larger blocksize limit for a long time. Roger Ver and Jihan Wu's reasons for supporting this grass roots movement aren't even relevant. 

>No reason to implement an unmanageable mega-database as a blockchain, just use a regular database and have Jihan host the servers. That's all it will become anyhow (if it becomes anything at all).

The alleged connection between blocksize and decentralization is a religious belief. No good scientific argument has ever been advanced to demonstrate it. The main argument for the centralizing effects of the blocksize limit to my knowledge involves the theory is that it lowers node count. This is somewhat plausible, but I don't even think any decent evidence has been offered to advance this theory. It could just as easily increase node count as it has on Ethereum. If I'm just HODLing BTC I would never ever run a full-node because why bother? I'm not using BTC for anything, I'm just waiting for the day when it gets to a high enough price that I'm happy with selling a good chunk of it. If I were doing a significant commerce with it then I might actually want to run my own node.

More than that though, most Bitcoin users will never want to run their own node and are perfectly content with the security guarantees of SPV. Crippling Bitcoin so that the very small percentage of users who will ever want to run a node can run a node a bit more cheaply than otherwise is madness.
> 1MB4EVA ethos

Can't even have this discussion if you're going to blatantly straw man. This is highly disingenuous or you just are unaware of what most of core says about blocksize.

>Even under this definition, there are plenty of blockchain devs who support on-chain scaling. Gavin Andresen, Mike Hearn, Jeff Garzik, and Vitalik Buterin to name just a few. The only way you can dismiss these guys as "serious developers" is to commit the no True Scotsman fallacy. This is not a good approach to making your argument that "BCash" sucks.

Not really. You can look at their standing within the community, things they've said/written and the code they've produced. I wouldn't really lump Vitalik with the rest but the three others have had some serious flubs and were largely ostracized from the Bitcoin community before BCash was even a thing. 

>What so terrible would have happened if Bitcoin had received even a modest blocksize increase before the fee events of last year? 

Slippery slope. Not required. Segwit adoption, schnorr and so forth before haphazard blocksize increases.

>I can only think of positives. People wouldn't have been turned off Bitcoin by seeing that the future of money is so expensive to transact with. Businesses wouldn't have stopped accepting Bitcoin. The altcoin boom would not have been as pronounced, etc.

These are all market effects and you can't prove a counterfactual. I'm talking about the tech and the network integrity, i.e. the viability of the project to fully realize its potential. Market maneuvering is an entirely different topic and beside the point.

>You're welcome to think that, but that's not a very good argument because there's no evidence for it. If you understand the history of Bitcoin you'll know there's been a large portion of the Bitcoin community that has been demanding a larger blocksize limit for a long time.

Consensus, bro. People want all sorts of things out of Bitcoin and when it doesn't deliver they make their own project and start working on that (Ethereum, for example). Again, the people who have really thought this problem through realize that there's a looming problem with continually increasing blocksize. This fucks with the economics, decentralization and creates a perpetuating problem that quickly gets out of hand. Appeal to minority is kind of ridiculous and, again, is completely antithetical to Bitcoin itself. Consensus...

>Roger Ver and Jihan Wu's reasons for supporting this grass roots movement aren't even relevant.

Lol, wut? These two helped orchestrate this whole false narrative of conflict and issues within the Bitcoin community. And they continue to product propaganda, co-opt Bitcoin websites and twitter handles and pull the wool over the communities eyes as best they can. The blatant pump and dumping we've seen (along with egregious behavior from CNBC and Coinbase) is anything but grassroots. 

>The alleged connection between blocksize and decentralization is a religious belief.

You've got to be joking.

>The main argument for the centralizing effects of the blocksize limit to my knowledge involves theory is that it lowers node count. This is somewhat plausible, but I don't even think any decent evidence has been offered to advance this theory. It could just as easily increase node count as it has on Ethereum. If I'm just HODLing BTC I would never ever run a full-node because why bother? 

Node viability decreases radically as blocksize increases (which BCH would have to increase to a massive degree to compete with the likes of any existing preferred centralized system). You don't see the problem of not being able to verify transactions independent of third parties? Wow, you really just don't understand the principles at play here. A token on a blockchain that's mined by a few warehouses around the world is not immutable, not fungible and not even verifiable. Plus, it's dumbly inefficient and there's zero reason to use that over a database.

Come on, dude. Don't buy the hype. Blocksize is an issue, including for Ethereum. Anyone who's convinced you that it's a "religious belief" is fooling you.

>Can't even have this discussion if you're going to blatantly straw man. This is highly disingenuous or you just are unaware of what most of core says about blocksize.

I'm very aware of what Core says about the blocksize. Are you aware? Did you know that Greg Maxwell thinks 1MB is just about optimal for Bitcoin and doesn't see any reason why it should ever be increased? You made some comment about how you think at some point they'll increase it once they have their ill-defined "consensus." When do you suppose that will be? Any guesses? Core's own words on this are that a blocksize increase takes 2-4 years to execute. That's to *execute*. 

The oft-mentioned but semi-mythical process of building a "consensus" to increase the blocks hasn't even started within Core. They're adopting a wait-and-see approach as they see what LN, Segwit, and Schnorr can do about the fees. Don't hold your breath for a blocksize increase. LN or some sidechain solution we haven't heard of absolutely has to work or BTC is dead. That seems like a crazy gamble to me. The market won't wait half a decade for Core to pull their heads out of their asses. 

>Not really. You can look at their standing within the community, things they've said/written and the code they've produced. I wouldn't really lump Vitalik with the rest but the three others have had some serious flubs and were largely ostracized from the Bitcoin community before BCash was even a thing.

Right. Again, this is the "No True Scotsman" fallacy. Remember what I said about how Core achieves consensus? These guys didn't tow the line about keeping blocks small so they were ostracized from the community.

>Slippery slope. Not required. Segwit adoption, schnorr and so forth before haphazard blocksize increases.

I think December fees proved that it was required. That was a massive availability and user-experience decline for a lot of people using the network. Do you think Facebook would have taken off as a service early on when it was first taking off if it went down for a month and its devs celebrated the outage with "champaign?" Moreover, if truly the BTC devs are so far ahead on delivering these layer 2 solutions that BTC needs there's no slippery slope. Increase the blocksize by a little bit to buy breathing room for the release of these new scaling features and then let them take over the bulk of the work scaling the network once they're ready.

>Consensus, bro. People want all sorts of things out of Bitcoin and when it doesn't deliver they make their own project and start working on that (Ethereum, for example). Again, the people who have really thought this problem through realize that there's a looming problem with continually increasing blocksize. This fucks with the economics, decentralization and creates a perpetuating problem that quickly gets out of hand. Appeal to minority is kind of ridiculous and, again, is completely antithetical to Bitcoin itself. Consensus...

All these claims are completely irrelevant to my point that wanting a network that doesn't shit the bed at a laughable ~3 TPS is a very natural thing to want, and doesn't require conspiracy theories about Roger and Jihan creating "BCash" from their underground lair. Achieving this by making the blocks bigger is very natural considering it's been how Bitcoin has dealt with increased traffic up to now. Think whatever you want about Bitcoin Cash, but it's obvious to me that there are many earnest people who care about Bitcoin's success who wanted bigger blocks and finally got them when Bitcoin Cash came to be.

>Node viability decreases radically as blocksize increases (which BCH would have to increase to a massive degree to compete with the likes of any existing preferred centralized system). 

Where's the empirical evidence of this? Ethereum has *more* transactions happening on it than BTC, and up to now it has scaled entirely by increasing the size of its blocks. Yet it has *more* full-nodes. So please present to me the evidence that larger blocks mean fewer full-nodes. 

At a certain point I think this might be true. You would probably price out most normal users from running their own node if the blocks were 1TB. But if the blocks were 5MB, 10, 15, 20, even 32MB I don't think you're pricing out that many people from running their own node, and you have so much more adoption at those levels that you're getting new people who might be interested in running nodes.

There's an undercurrent in what you're saying here where you seem to be worrying about catastrophic success. If BTC had say 32 MB blocks, how quickly do you think those would fill up? The entire world's just piling on to Bitcoin at once for some reason? No it would just be able to keep growing at a rate of roughly 70% per year and would take quite some time to reach the new cap.

>You don't see the problem of not being able to verify transactions independent of third parties? Wow, you really just don't understand the principles at play here. A token on a blockchain that's mined by a few warehouses around the world is not immutable, not fungible and not even verifiable. Plus, it's dumbly inefficient and there's zero reason to use that over a database.

You can verify your own transactions using *SPV*. The entire reason Satoshi used Merkle trees was to enable SPV. You know that right? What's the point of verifying everyone else in the world's transactions when you can cheaply and efficiently verify your own with SPV?
> All these claims are completely irrelevant to my point that wanting a network that doesn't shit the bed at a laughable ~3 TPS is a very natural thing to want

We all want the same thing. It's about how to you achieve that, while also maintaining network integrity. Blowing up the blocksize with no end in sight is terrible design and puts the network at risk.

>doesn't require conspiracy theories about Roger and Jihan creating "BCash" from their underground lair.

Strawman.

>Where's the empirical evidence of this? Ethereum has more transactions happening on it than BTC, and up to now it has scaled entirely by increasing the size of its blocks. Yet it has more full-nodes. So please present to me the evidence that larger blocks mean fewer full-nodes.

Transactions are counted differently on ETH than BTC. Also, correlation vs causation much? Also, blocksize is an ongoing concern with Ether too, obviously.
 

>But if the blocks were 5MB, 10, 15, 20, even 32MB I don't think you're pricing out that many people from running their own node, and you have so much more adoption at those levels that you're getting new people who might be interested in running nodes.

Lol, 32 MB blocks are not going to service 8 billion people.

>You can verify your own transactions using SPV. The entire reason Satoshi used Merkle trees was to enable SPV. You know that right? What's the point of verifying everyone else in the world's transactions when you can cheaply and efficiently verify your own with SPV?

SPV is not the same thing as a node and can't verify incoming transactions. You know that, right?

---

The bottom line is that block size increase is a hard fork. BCH didn't capture consensus and therefore it's not Bitcoin. Yet, for some reason, it's main proponents are insistent that it be referred to and branded with a similar name and logo. BCH is a co-opting of the Bitcoin network and is only valuable as such. Litecoin is what BCH wants to be but with an organic network and better tech. BTC is the slow-moving, consensus coin... and that's the whole point. When the time comes to upgrade the blocksize (in support of additional layers and after Segwit, Schnorr, etc. are fully up and running), **then** consensus will form around a size increase and a fork implement **that is non-contentious**. 
>We all want the same thing. It's about how to you achieve that, while also maintaining network integrity. Blowing up the blocksize with no end in sight is terrible design and puts the network at risk.

Agree to disagree I guess. Increasing the blocksize limit just means we can take more traffic. Doesn't mean the network will actually see that additional traffic. When Satoshi set the blocksize limit of 1 MB it was 100x larger than needed to accommodate for the blocks that Bitcoin was seeing. I'm not sure why the blockchain will suddenly explode in size if once again Bitcoin has a blocksize limit larger than the traffic it is seeing. Why did traffic increase about 70% a year when the blocksize limit was 1MB but a bigger blocksize limit means traffic will just explode instantly to meet the new blocksize limit? 

More than that though, from my perspective if suddenly Bitcoin's popularity exploded and it had GB blocks I would consider that a tremendous victory, and its price would be through the roof. The average person would have to verify their transactions with SPV, but the average person **already does** verify their transactions with SPV. You're never going to get more than 1% of users who even **want** to run a node. 

>Transactions are counted differently on ETH than BTC. Also, correlation vs causation much? Also, blocksize is an ongoing concern with Ether too, obviously.

How is this not evidence against the idea that the blocksize limit is a coefficient that when you make it smaller increases the full-node count and when you make it bigger decreases the full-node count? This is the most low-effort reply you've given so far. 

>Lol, 32 MB blocks are not going to service 8 billion people.

8 billion people will not be transacting on any cryptocurrency any time soon. Period paragraph. Bitcoin should be capable of meeting its actual demand and its projected demand. When it fails at this it allows openings for upstart cryptocurrencies to displace it. Up to now it has had a moat in the form of its network effect. If people can't transact with it that network effect is eroded. *This is bad* because it means even if LN works, something like ETH that can also support LN but doesn't give as big of a "Fuck you" to its users as the Core devs have will just cannibalize any users BTC can hope to get back from the eventual success of its scaling solutions. 

>SPV is not the same thing as a node and can't verify incoming transactions. You know that, right?

What? By "incoming transactions" do you mean transactions that have no confirmations yet? If so, what's your point? In 10 minutes you can then verify the transaction using SPV. If this is not what you mean you need to do your research because it absolutely can and does.

>Yet, for some reason, it's main proponents are insistent that it be referred to and branded with a similar name and logo. BCH is a co-opting of the Bitcoin network and is only valuable as such. Litecoin is what BCH wants to be but with an organic network and better tech.

**Wrong**. Forks are how disputes have always been settled in open-source software development. If you have a problem with that than the world of open-source is not for you. Bitcoin Core does not own the Bitcoin name. If you feel they should then stop pretending like decentralization matters to you.

>When the time comes to upgrade the blocksize (in support of additional layers and after Segwit, Schnorr, etc. are fully up and running), then consensus will form around a size increase and a fork implement that is non-contentious.

You're so wrong if you think that would be uncontentious. The entire BTC community has been taught that hard forks are inherently bad and require almost unanimous consensus. Where do you imagine that consensus coming from? All the people up to now who have supported blocksize increases have been cast out of the BTC community. They've been banned from rBitcoin. Even the moderate blockers are mostly gone after the failure of Segwit2x. All the loudest voices for a blocksize increase are gone and we're left with a group of people who think hard forks are bad, increasing the blocksize is a slippery slope that increases centralization, and 1MB is enough so long as we have second-layer solutions like lightning and sidechains. Such a change will be contentious among the devs too. Do you think extremists like Greg Maxwell are going to just wake up one day and realise the hardline stance they've taken, that has brought them nothing but total victory so far, needs to be moderated a little bit? What could do that? Because $55 fees should have done that but instead Greg cracked open the "champaign."
> Agree to disagree I guess. Increasing the blocksize limit just means we can take more traffic. Doesn't mean the network will actually see that additional traffic. When Satoshi set the blocksize limit of 1 MB it was 100x larger than needed to accommodate for the blocks that Bitcoin was seeing. I'm not sure why the blockchain will suddenly explode in size if once again Bitcoin has a blocksize limit larger than the traffic it is seeing. Why did traffic increase about 70% a year when the blocksize limit was 1MB but a bigger blocksize limit means traffic will just explode instantly to meet the new blocksize limit?
> 
> More than that though, from my perspective if suddenly Bitcoin's popularity exploded and it had GB blocks I would consider that a tremendous victory, and its price would be through the roof. The average person would have to verify their transactions with SPV, but the average person already does verify their transactions with SPV. You're never going to get more than 1% of users who even want to run a node.

That's not at all the point. The point is that you *can't* run a node, which is a big problem. SPV does not verify incoming transactions and they're entirely dependent on actual nodes.

You're really not seeing the issue here. Raise blocksize and spam increases. Blocks become full. Raise again, spam increases. Cheap on chain transactions equals cheap spam. Bottom line. It's a terrible way to scale to begin with, but it also creates a perpetual economic problem. We've already seen this with Bitcoin, so it's not just theoretical either.

>How is this not evidence against the idea that the blocksize limit is a coefficient that when you make it smaller increases the full-node count and when you make it bigger decreases the full-node count? This is the most low-effort reply you've given so far.

Is this a joke? I gave you a simple answer because the proposition is ridiculous. Again, transactions mean something entirely different with Ether, they are counted differently *and* blockchain size is **already** an issue that is being worked on with Ethereum. You can't claim that adding 100 lbs to an automobile increases its performance/safety and therefore adding an endless supply of weight is a good thing. I'm not even going to engage this line of thinking further, it's beyond fallacious, it's just silly. Blocksize is a problem and *everyone* knows this at this point. Referencing Satoshi or novel examples is just a fool's errand.

>What? By "incoming transactions" do you mean transactions that have no confirmations yet? If so, what's your point? In 10 minutes you can then verify the transaction using SPV. If this is not what you mean you need to do your research because it absolutely can and does.

Nah, bro. *You* need to do your homework, that's not how SPV works. SPV relies on honest nodes and miners to verify transactions sent to the wallet. 

>Wrong. Forks are how disputes have always been settled in open-source software development. If you have a problem with that than the world of open-source is not for you. Bitcoin Core does not own the Bitcoin name. If you feel they should then stop pretending like decentralization matters to you.

100% agree. Core **does not** control bitcoin, the miners do. Bitcoin is the consensus network. In other words, Bitcoin is BTC because that's the **non-contentious** side of the fork. Nobody owns Bitcoin, exactly right, it's all in the consensus. I didn't Ver should stop, I said that what he's doing is deceitful and duplicitous. In the end it won't amount to anything though, which I think is pretty evident at this point. It's merely a pump and dump scheme that benefited from Bitcoin's distribution. 

>You're so wrong if you think that would be uncontentious. The entire BTC community has been taught that hard forks are inherently bad and require almost unanimous consensus. Where do you imagine that consensus coming from? All the people up to now who have supported blocksize increases have been cast out of the BTC community. They've been banned from rBitcoin. Even the moderate blockers are mostly gone after the failure of Segwit2x. All the loudest voices for a blocksize increase are gone and we're left with a group of people who think hard forks are bad, increasing the blocksize is a slippery slope that increases centralization, and 1MB is enough so long as we have second-layer solutions like lightning and sidechains. Such a change will be contentious among the devs too. Do you think extremists like Greg Maxwell are going to just wake up one day and realise the hardline stance they've taken, that has brought them nothing but total victory so far, needs to be moderated a little bit? What could do that? Because $55 fees should have done that but instead Greg cracked open the "champaign."

You honestly have no idea what your talking about. Even Back and Maxwell (enemies of the state for BCash shills) are fully on board with block size increases. You're just arguing against an entirely fabricated straw man.

You're clearly not interested in having a rational debate based on the facts, only yelling about Core, claiming that they are against block size increases, which is a flat out lie. 

Good luck with this false narrative. I eagerly await the day when anybody takes BCash seriously. 
So I'm not going to get into the rest of this, but one part of this is easily settled...

> Nah, bro. You need to do your homework, that's not how SPV works. SPV relies on honest nodes and miners to verify transactions sent to the wallet.

This is flat out wrong.

SPV nodes who are being paid need to be told "*There's a transaction that paid you with TXHASH, and it was mined in block #123456.*"  (Actually they ask for block hash but height is easier to visualize).  They could be lied to about these two things, but it won't matter as you'll see because they do validate what they are told.

SPV nodes have all of the block headers, which would include block #123456.  Without spending tens of thousands of dollars every 10 minutes(aka a 51% attack), they cannot be lied to about these things, as they can hash each block header together to get a result and match it up against the PoW, and they can read the timestamps to match the difficulty of the chain.  These block headers are 80 bytes each(~4.1 mb per *year*) and they don't need any transaction data to verify the POW backing the headers, so it isn't a problem for them to retrieve/validate/keep all of these at any given time.

So now to verify the transaction they were informed of, they request 1) the full data of that transaction(~150-600 bytes), and 2) the merkle path(~704 bytes) for that transaction from block #123456.  Again, they could be lied to, but it wouldn't matter as they're going to verify what they are told.

When they receive the full data of the transaction, they check the outputs to make sure it does in fact go to an public key address they control.  If it doesn't, the node informing them made a mistake and they'll either need to update what addresses they are watching for, or they know they were lied to and disconnect from that node.  Then they hash the transaction.  If the transaction hash doesn't match the transaction hash they were given above, they've been lied to and they disconnect from that node.

Then they hash the provided merkle path with the transaction hash.  This **must** result in the merkle root *that they already know from the block header for block 123456*.  This is 64 bytes - to fake this verification would require a 256 bit SHA256 collision, which basically isn't going to happen unless sha256 is broken.  If the merkle path doesn't match they know they were lied to and they disconnect from that node.  If a node doesn't want to provide the merkle path for their request, they can simply download the transaction hash list for that single block (128kb, about the size of a well compressed jpg) and hash the merkle tree themselves.

SPV nodes do validate transactions they care about and they can tell if they have been lied to unless the attacker is essentially 51% attacking the chain.  /u/Zectro is correct.
This is completely wrong. The only way to validate a transaction is to validate all the previous blocks for the inputs. Otherwise you're relying on nodes and nodes can send you false transactions. I'm not following your point on block headers. Either way you're relying on honest nodes. SPV is not a node and nodes matter. There's no way around that. BCashers arguing that massive blocks aren't going to lead to node centralization and put the network at risk because of SPV wallets are not being honest about how the network works. Nodes are required to validate transactions. Even if what your saying is true, which I don't think it is, the SPV wallet is still depending on honest nodes, which, if massive blocks are allow will certainly fall into the hands of centralized parties, which ruins the whole premise. 

Again, the broader debate over scaling is pretty much settled at this point. Nobody thinks it's reasonable or possible to safely and effectively scale the chain. Massive blocks are a problem. This is known at this point and consensus between miners, developers and traders is that layer 2 is needed. BCH can do as they please on their chain but it's clear that the end game is a brick wall. There's no possibility of sidestepping the issues with on chain scaling, it simply doesn't pan out in the end.

> This is completely wrong. The only way to validate a transaction is to validate all the previous blocks for the inputs. Otherwise you're relying on nodes and nodes can send you false transactions. 

I just explained how they literally cannot do this.  The only way to do it is to blow hundreds of thousands of dollars creating valid PoW headers for invalid blocks.

If I'm wrong, you're going to need to demonstrate it because I walked you through the entire process.

> Even if what your saying is true, which I don't think it is, the SPV wallet is still depending on honest nodes

No they are not.  They only need someone to provide the information.  That information cannot lie to them because they verify it.
[Here](https://bitcoin.stackexchange.com/questions/38418/how-does-an-spv-wallet-use-the-headers-that-it-downloads/38419#38419)

>Not being able to do full validations of blocks means that you could potentially accept payment in a block that the network will not accept because it is invalid in a place you can't validate (spends outputs that don't exist, for example). There is a trust in miners for this security model, and relies on them doing the validation of transactions for the system to be of sufficient security. This is usually supported by waiting for multiple confirmations on transactions, making an assumption about how much a malicious miner will be willing to throw away on an invalid chain in order to dupe SPV clients.

>It has been shown in the 5th of July 2015 forking event that a significant portion of miners do no validation at all of block contents in some situations. In this particular event SPV clients could have seen 6 confirmations (the generally accepted "safe" amount) on transactions which were actually invalited. In this case all SPV wallets and most block explorers (and the wallet services which use their API) were at risk of losses if they accepted money in transactions which were later found to be double spends in the main chain.
> Not being able to do full validations of blocks means that you could potentially accept payment in a block that the network will not accept because it is invalid in a place you can't validate (spends outputs that don't exist, for example).

Assuming you accept the transaction after 3 confirmations, the attacker would need to spend 12.5 x $8,900 x 3 = $333,750 to create 3 fake blocks to attack your SPV client.

Are you accepting a transaction worth more than $333,750 and cannot wait more confirmations?  If so, you should be running a full node.  If not, it would cost significantly more to attack you than could possibly be profited from.  That's assuming that the attacker fully isolates you from the network; If they don't, they must get those 3 blocks in a row and must trick you before the network extends a longer chain, aka... a 51% attack.

> It has been shown in the 5th of July 2015 forking event that a significant portion of miners do no validation at all of block contents in some situations.

Due to a **bug**.  The blocks weren't actually invalid according to un-updated full nodes, which would **ALSO have been vulnerable to this "attack."**  Seeing as the fork was scheduled and even those un-upgraded miners would not have accepted invalid transactions, this is a non issue.  And the miners who didn't upgrade there lost 225 BTC from the 9 invalid blocks they created, punishing them just like the system would cost an attacker money if they tried to attack SPV wallets.

You claimed that SPV wallets do not validate.  You were wrong, they do validate.  Admit it.
I'm not wrong. SPV validation does not ensure that the UTXOs were actually spent to your address, only that a transaction exists. In order to verify, you need to verify each block or rely on a node and you need to trust miners. Something that you don't need to do with a full node. It's at simple as that.

Claiming I'm wrong doesn't make it so. 
> I'm not wrong. SPV validation does not ensure that the UTXOs were actually spent to your address, only that a transaction exists. 

And was mined into a block where someone was willing to spend $111,250 to say it is valid.

That's called an economic protection.  You're trusting economics that no rational attacker will spend $333,750 just to steal your $200. As it turns out, Bitcoin was built on these exact sort of economic guarantees, and this is also why Maxwell "proved" that Bitcoin was impossible years ago.  These are things you probably should understand if you're going to go out telling people how Bitcoin works.
Condescend all you want. You're arguing my point for me. SPV wallets are inherently riskier than running a full node and **they rely on honest nodes and miners**. You're seemingly not denying this, so I'm not sure why you're pretending to be right. You've done this several times in this sub to. We get it, you're a BCH and ETH shill, that doesn't mean that SPV wallets are trustless. 
> Condescend all you want. You're arguing my point for me. SPV wallets are inherently riskier than running a full node and they rely on honest nodes and miners.

They rely on economic protections.  That's not the same as trust unless you're also admitting that Bitcoin is a trust-based system.  Is that what you want to claim, that Bitcoin is not trustless and is relying on the honesty of miners?

No one said SPV wallets are trustless.  We said they do verify transactions.  You said they didn't.  You were wrong.
>  that Bitcoin is not trustless and is relying on the honesty of miners?

It's not trustless if bad actors can leverage the network but, either way, if you're running a full node, you can't be lied to by miners. This is obviously not true with SPV, I don't even know why you're debating this still.

>We said they do verify transactions. You said they didn't. You were wrong.

They don't. They don't verify the full chain of transactions, only the transaction they're looking for. There's no way to tell if the transactions UTXOs are valid because you need to check preceding transactions. 

Just stop. I see you doing this everywhere. You start shilling shitcoins with false information. I already linked you to an explanation and detailed this several times myself. You're just being dishonest about how this works. SPV wallets are inherently more risky than a full node because they aren't actually verifying the entire set of UTXOs. 
> It's not trustless if bad actors can leverage the network but, either way, if you're running a full node, you can't be lied to by miners. 

Sure they can lie to you.  They can 51% attack the network and double spend funds you accepted with a 6+ block reorg.  It isn't a trustless system.

Would you like to explain how a full node isn't vulnerable to that?

> Just stop. I see you doing this everywhere. You start shilling shitcoins with false information.

I'm talking about YOUR coin, and there's nothing I have said that is false.  You linked me to an explanation that dodges the important issue - The SPV wallets do, in fact, do validation unlike your claim.
It doesn't. If you can't validate signatures for previous inputs, then you have no way of knowing if the transactions is valid. You only know that their is an associated signed transaction for your address, not that it contains the right amount of inputs that are validly signed. Also, as an aside, SPV has no way to verify unconfirmed transactions, unlike a full node. 


> It doesn't. If you can't validate signatures for previous inputs, then you have no way of knowing if the transactions is valid.

/u/Zectro correctly stated that SPV nodes validate the transaction after the transaction is mined.  He was correct.  You arbitrarily define "validate transactions" in a way that makes it look like you weren't wrong, but then ignore that that same definition turns Bitcoin itself into a trust-based system because fullnodes can't do anything about a 51% reorg.

You. Were. Wrong. Stop evading and admit that you didn't realize that SPV actually does perform merkle-path validation of the transactions and PoW validation of the headers and you were simply uninfomed about how exactly SPV works.
That same definition turns Bitcoin into a trust-based system? No it doesn't. SPV transactions don't validate the history of transactions and rely on trust, something that isn't true of full nodes.

Enough. You don't know what you're talking about and you're shilling for BCash and ETH is well documented and extensive throughout this sub.

Claiming something is true does not make it so. And this is without noting the other problems with SPV (privacy, 0-conf). The bottom line is that big blocks are a problem, from a number of angles. SPV wallets are not equal in security or function to full nodes and big blocks prevent full nodes from being operable by low-resource participants. 
> That same definition turns Bitcoin into a trust-based system? No it doesn't. SPV transactions don't validate the history of transactions and rely on trust, something that isn't true of full nodes.

SPV transactions are protected economically.  That is the entire point, by design.

The same economic protections are the only thing preventing fullnodes from being 51% attacked in a reorg.

If you won't accept economic protections in one scenario, you don't get to claim it in the other.  That's not how game theory works.

> And this is without noting the other problems with SPV (privacy, 0-conf).  SPV wallets are not equal in security or function to full nodes 

You didn't make any claims about that until now, and I wasn't addressing any of that.  No one has claimed that they are equal in security, only that they do validate and they have more than adequate security for 99% of the population.  You claimed that they simply trusted fullnodes and miners, and you were wrong.

> The bottom line is that big blocks are a problem, from a number of angles.

The bottom line is you're shilling a whole slew of things that you don't actually understand.  And when you're obviously caught on your own lack of knowledge, you refuse to admit that you didn't actually know how it worked.
What am I wrong about? SPV relies on honest nodes and miners. Full nodes do not. Without the full data set, you can't properly vet incoming transactions. End of story. It's you who doesn't know what they're talking about.

Economic protections for miners is irrelevant to the discussion. I'm talking about *how* SPV verifies transactions and how it's different from full nodes (disadvantaged).
> What am I wrong about? SPV relies on honest nodes and miners. Full nodes do not.

SPV relies upon economic protections.

Fullnodes also rely on economic protections.

> Without the full data set, you can't properly vet incoming transactions. End of story. It's you who doesn't know what they're talking about.

You didn't realize that SPV does POW validation and merkle-path validation.  You didn't even know what merkle-path validation was.  You were uninformed.  It's ok, there's plenty of things I'm uninformed about too.  When I find one, I admit it and update my knowledge and adjust my subjective evaluations of different arguments.  If you don't want to admit it that's up to you, but I'm calling you out point blank and if anyone else reads this it'll be readily apparent that you were uninformed and don't want to admit it.
> Fullnodes also rely on economic protections.

Except they don't. Full nodes verify transactions independently of what block headers say, also they can verify 0-conf transactions.

>You didn't realize that SPV does POW validation and merkle-path validation. You didn't even know what merkle-path validation was. You were uninformed. It's ok, there's plenty of things I'm uninformed about too. When I find one, I admit it and update my knowledge and adjust my subjective evaluations of different arguments. If you don't want to admit it that's up to you, but I'm calling you out point blank and if anyone else reads this it'll be readily apparent that you were uninformed and don't want to admit it.

See, you don't know what you're talking about. You're just trying to grandstand. I understand how SPV validates by checking block headers. That doesn't change the fact that they are depending on 3rd parties for validating transactions and never check the validity of prior signatures, therefore there is extra trust involved. **This is not the case with full nodes**. Go back and read my initial post, I never said anything different and what I say stands.

There's nothing for me to admit I was wrong about. If there was, I would admit it. A cursory examination of my post history would reveal many examples of me changing my mind and/or admitting I was wrong. 

But go on, keep grandstanding and arguing against a strawman. It's a good look.

> Except they don't. Full nodes verify transactions independently of what block headers say, also they can verify 0-conf transactions.

Which does them fuck-all good if the miners reorg the chain and double-spend them.  They cannot verify against that.

> I understand how SPV validates by checking block headers.

Oh, really?  Let's check...

[Oops, doesn't seem like it.](https://imgur.com/k9ZzT17)

> That doesn't change the fact that they are depending on 3rd parties for validating transactions and never check the validity of prior signatures, therefore there is extra trust involved. 

If you define "extra trust" as "a lower level of economic protections" then you are correct, and no one said otherwise.

But since the "higher level" is also completely dependent upon economic protections, your statements are just about you drawing arbitrary lines in the sand.
It's not arbitrary to say that SPV cannot validate signatures for the chain of inputs. Validating via the block header is not the same thing as validating the chain, like a full node does. 

My not understanding your point about headers was in reference to validating signatures, not validating the transaction via the block header. 

Not even sure what we're disagreeing about here. I understand the economic disincentives for 51% attacks, it just really beside the point I'm making. SPV wallets are not truly validating transactions the way a full node does. It's not true verification and it puts the trust on the node the wallet is interacting with and the miners providing the blocks. This is not the case with full nodes, which are actually the protection against double spends anyhow. Detecting if the network is under attack is the job of full nodes. SPV wallets are helpless to even begin to understand if anything is awry. 

The bottom line is that full node and miner decentralization is paramount to protecting the network, which is how this whole conversation started. Without protecting the ability for low-resource actors to get a node up and running, the safety and security of the network suffers as a result and Bitcoin is diminished.
> It's not arbitrary to say that SPV cannot validate signatures for the chain of inputs. Validating via the block header is not the same thing as validating the chain, like a full node does.

I never said it was.

It is arbitrary to say that full node "validation" is trustless but SPV "validation" is not.  They're both flawed validation procedures.  SPV validation is lightweight and easy, perfect for 99% of the world - exactly as claimed.  Fullnode validation is, however, not trustless.

>  I understand the economic disincentives for 51% attacks, it just really beside the point I'm making.

It's pivotal to the point.  SPV wallets are economically protected.  Fullnodes are economically protected.  There's nothing wrong with either of these, and SPV wallets are the right choice for 95+% of the world's usecases.

> It's not true verification and it puts the trust on the node the wallet is interacting with and the miners providing the blocks. 

It puts the trust that the miners aren't willing to blow a million dollars to steal your $200.  That's not anything like what you are implying.

> This is not the case with full nodes, which are actually the protection against double spends anyhow.

Uh, what?

> Detecting if the network is under attack is the job of full nodes.

You do realize that SPV clients would see a chain reorg just as well as a fullnode... right?  They wouldn't see the full detail, but they would see it just like fullnodes see it.  Fullnodes cannot protect against chain reorgs either.

> SPV wallets are helpless to even begin to understand if anything is awry.

Uh, wrong.  They're getting all the block headers, remember?  I thought you said you understood this.  It appears that you do not understand this.  With the full block headers they can clearly see a reorg taking place.

> The bottom line is that full node and miner decentralization is paramount to protecting the network

No, the bottom line is you don't understand half of what you're talking about.  Your conclusions are based on very poor understanding of the underlying systems as well as game theory and economics, and thus are horribly flawed.
> It is arbitrary to say that full node "validation" is trustless but SPV "validation" is not. They're both flawed validation procedures. SPV validation is lightweight and easy, perfect for 99% of the world - exactly as claimed. Fullnode validation is, however, not trustless.

It's one step removed from a full node. So it involved more trust, as I've specified several times already.

>SPV wallets are economically protected. 

No, not what I'm talking about. SPV relies on honest communication with nodes. It's not a full verification. 

>It puts the trust that the miners aren't willing to blow a million dollars to steal your $200. That's not anything like what you are implying.

What does this have to do with the verification procedure, which is reliant on trust. Bottom line. Full nodes don't operate like this. They validate transactions independently. 

>You do realize that SPV clients would see a chain reorg just as well as a fullnode... right? They wouldn't see the full detail, but they would see it just like fullnodes see it. Fullnodes cannot protect against chain reorgs either.

How would they see this? They don't have the full data set.

>Uh, wrong. They're getting all the block headers, remember? I thought you said you understood this. It appears that you do not understand this. With the full block headers they can clearly see a reorg taking place.

How? How do you detect someone else's double spend from an SPV wallet?

I do understand the game theoretic aspects of the economics of mining Bitcoin. I understand that even central parties are normally incentivized to not crash the price. I get that. The point is that that's not always the case and Bitcoin is more stable, immutable, fungible, censorship-resistant, etc without centralization. There are many scenarios one can dream up where a central (rational) figure *would* attack the network. Blowing up the block size and centralizing nodes and mining is a problem, bottom line. SPV verification is not the same thing as full node verification and is inherently less secure when accepting transactions. 

I don't need to continue this conversation. Your pretentious contention that I'm wrong about SPVs is rather obnoxious.  



> It's one step removed from a full node. So it involved more trust, as I've specified several times already.

Yep, and I haven't disagreed with that.  Your original claim wasn't that it involved more trust, your original claim was that it did not do validation at all.  [Word for word you said:](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/dxuabai/)

> > **SPV does not verify incoming transactions** and they're entirely dependent on actual nodes.

The former part of that sentence is wrong as I've proven and you've now agreed - they DO verify incoming transactions, they just don't verify the utxo's that fed that, which is not what you said before.  Moreover, the second half of that sentence is ALSO false, as they could easily retrieve the information from a blockchain explorer.

> No, not what I'm talking about. SPV relies on honest communication with nodes. It's not a full verification.

Look, lets go back to exactly what you said, [word for word.](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/dxuv4q2/)

> > Otherwise you're relying on nodes and nodes can send you false transactions.

You said nodes could send you false transactions.  You were wrong, flat out.  Nodes cannot do this.  Miners can spend huge amounts of money to send them POW-valid blocks containing false transactions, but that is not what you said.  You still haven't admitted that you had this wrong, or anything else.

Now you're changing that to "full verification" and defining full verification to mean "Like a full node" but you're not willing to consider the vulnerability in how fullnodes do their verification.  Sure, make up the rules as you go, that won't make your argument look bad!

> Bottom line. Full nodes don't operate like this. They validate transactions independently.

They are built on trust in the economic protections against a 51% attack.  The same as SPV clients are.

Their independent validation cannot protect them from a reorg double spend.

> How would they see this? They don't have the full data set.

You do know what a re-org is... right?

> How? How do you detect someone else's double spend from an SPV wallet?

Non-0-conf double spends require a re-org.  SPV clients can obviously see a re-org.
> Yep, and I haven't disagreed with that. Your original claim wasn't that it involved more trust, your original claim was that it did not do validation at all. Word for word you said:

>SPV does not verify incoming transactions and they're entirely dependent on actual nodes.

It doesn't very the totality of the chain of transactions, only the transactions pertinent to the wallet addressed. This is not the same type of verification. Semantics.

>The former part of that sentence is wrong as I've proven and you've now agreed - they DO verify incoming transactions, they just don't verify the utxo's that fed that, which is not what you said before. 

Yes, they validate *that* transaction and rely on 3rd parties to do so. That's not the same thing and you're arguing something extremely petty. 

>they could easily retrieve the information from a blockchain explorer.

And where do you think an explorer pulls data from? Hmmm....

>You said nodes could send you false transactions. You were wrong, flat out. Nodes cannot do this. Miners can spend huge amounts of money to send them POW-valid blocks containing false transactions, but that is not what you said. You still haven't admitted that you had this wrong, or anything else.

No, you are wrong. The 3rd party can send you transactions that are signed but are not valid. SPV doesn't have the ability to check signature data across previous transactions, all they can verify is that the signature is valid for the TX into the wallet. 

>Now you're changing that to "full verification" and defining full verification to mean "Like a full node" but you're not willing to consider the vulnerability in how fullnodes do their verification. Sure, make up the rules as you go, that won't make your argument look bad!

What vulnerability are you referring to? Bad blocks?

>They are built on trust in the economic protections against a 51% attack. The same as SPV clients are.

No they aren't. Full nodes can validate transactions that aren't even confirmed in a block yet, something SPV cannot do anyhow. Full nodes are a check against bad miners. Again, SPV are not. 

---

I'm done. You're arguing the most ridiculous semantics and getting hung up on terms like "full verification," when I'm merely clarifying my original point. Take this nonsense to /r/iamverysmart. You didn't disprove my point and begging me to admit to such nonsense is a worthless endeavor. SPV clients do not enforce network consensus and are not a replacement for low barrier-of-entry full nodes. 
> It doesn't very the totality of the chain of transactions, only the transactions pertinent to the wallet addressed. 

Aka, only the transactions the user cares about.  I can't imagine why 95% of the users would have a problem with this...

> Yes, they validate that transaction and rely on 3rd parties to do so. 

The third parties can't lie to them.  "Rely on" is not the same as "trust."  You seem to mix those words up.  Whenever it is convenient.

> No, you are wrong. The 3rd party can send you transactions that are signed but are not valid.

Non-mining nodes can't, they must be included in a POW valid block before it will matter to a SPV client.

> all they can verify is that the signature is valid for the TX into the wallet.

And that the transaction was included in <block> and mined upon to <depth>.  Aka, that someone was willing to spend x hundreds of thousands of dollars to back that.

Kind of an important detail, but I guess it's best to ignore things you don't like - funny how often Core does that.

> What vulnerability are you referring to? Bad blocks?

Double spend via 6+ block re-org.  Aka 51% attack.
Okay, buddy, sure. Core is the Illuminati and has complete control over Bitcoin miners, forums and markets. It's all a conspiracy to keep BCash down. Big blocks aren't actually a problem. SPV clients aren't actually worthless to the network. It's all a big conspiracy because Core is pushing a false narrative and controlling what people mine and trade. 

Mhmm.
I didn't say any of that, but nice straw man.
No, you seemed to either suggest *I* was "Core" or that all Core developers are ignoring details. The irony is truly not lost on me here. Typical BCasher who can't accept the concept of consensus. 

The debate is over, the community went with Bitcoin. Will BCH flip it at some point? Anything's possible, I guess but why? What's changed since August? People knew about the differences between the side chains and the projected roadmap for each. Why is BCash due to become more valuable when its been fighting for 10% for a while and 20% isn't all that impressive either. If BCash was the real Bitcoin / better project then why is the market taking *so long* to switch over? Why was the value falling for so long and why is volume so lackluster?

Please, enlighten me. Why is BTC still so much more valuable and relevant after almost 9 months? 
I have deliberately not engaged you on basically any points like this for a reason.  I can't imagine anything can come of it.  You've made up your mind based on whatever you've read and so have I.  I was simply hoping to discuss the SPV issue and have you walk away with a better understanding of exactly what it is and isn't useful for.

If you really seriously want to discuss we could tomorrow, but I really don't see any point.  I can't see any benefits for either of us.
> and isn't useful for.

What is it *not* useful for?
If someone is likely to receive payments totaling over $100k in a 24 hour period and credit someone else because of it (I.e., not going to wait a day or two to ship goods), they should not be using SPV, period.  The economic protections are not sufficient for their use case, and they can easily afford to run a full node at any scale.

SPV is for casual users and low payment value stuff.  There's others I could specifically state it isn't good for(mining, etc), but that's the obvious one.  Economic protections aren't worth a damn if people forget the limitations of those protections.

Edit: Also if someone is very privacy conscious.  For people who have no reason why anyone else would be analyzing their transactions it isn't a concern.  For people who shard their requests across multiple sources and add in herring items in the requests, they still get a good amount of privacy.  But for those who either truly need high privacy (or think they do) SPV isn't good for them.  Of course they should be using Monero then, so it is a moot point.
The privacy concerns don't necessarily relate to wanting to anonymity traffic but rather keep addresses in the wallet from being linked. Monero is not necessary for avoiding this, just a full node.

I never ever said SPV wasn't useful, this whole conversation started and was focused, from my POV, on the issues with high barrier to entry nodes. The problems with not being able to run your own node if you need to and instead relying on an SPV client. 

I never said SPV doesn't have its place.
